--
From: unknown
Subject: (no subject)

Introduction
Welcome to the Common Lisp Charter Subgroup.
In order to mail to this group, send to the address:

		CL-Charter@su-ai.arpa

Capitalization is not necessary, and if you are directly on the ARPANET,
you can nickname SU-AI.ARPA as SAIL. An archive of messages is kept on
SAIL in the file:

			   CLCHRT.MSG[COM,LSP]

You can read this file or FTP it away without logging in to SAIL.

To communicate with the moderator, send to the address:

		CL-Charter-request@su-ai.arpa

Here is a list of the people who are currently on the mailing list:

Person			Affiliation	Net Address

Gary Brown		DEC		gbrown@dec-marlboro
Martin Griss		HP		griss.hplabs@csnet-relay (I hope)
Joe Ginder		PERQ		Joseph.Ginder@cmu-cs-spice
Dick Gabriel		Stanford/Lucid	rpg@sail
Steve Ford		TI		Ford.ti-csl@csnet-relay
Carl Hewitt		MIT		Hewitt-charter@mc
Mark Hatch		Apollo		hatch@aerospace
Dan Weinreb		Symbolics	DLW@scrc-stonybrook
Rick Hudson		UMass		hudson.umass-cs@csnet-relay
Govind Deshpande	JPL		deshpande@jpl-vlsi.arpa
Beau Sheil		Xerox		sheil@xerox

The first order of business is for each of us to ask people we know who may
be interested in this subgroup if they would like to be added to this list.

Next, we ought to consider who might wish to be the chairman of this subgroup.
Before this happens, I think we ought to wait until the list is more nearly
complete.

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Introduction
Date: 23 Sep 1984 16:37 EST

Welcome to the Common Lisp Charter Subgroup.
In order to mail to this group, send to the address:

		CL-Charter@su-ai.arpa

Capitalization is not necessary, and if you are directly on the ARPANET,
you can nickname SU-AI.ARPA as SAIL. An archive of messages is kept on
SAIL in the file:

			   CLCHRT.MSG[COM,LSP]

You can read this file or FTP it away without logging in to SAIL.

To communicate with the moderator, send to the address:

		CL-Charter-request@su-ai.arpa

Here is a list of the people who are currently on the mailing list:

Person			Affiliation	Net Address

Gary Brown		DEC		gbrown@dec-marlboro
Martin Griss		HP		griss.hplabs@csnet-relay (I hope)
Joe Ginder		PERQ		Joseph.Ginder@cmu-cs-spice
Dick Gabriel		Stanford/Lucid	rpg@sail
Steve Ford		TI		Ford.ti-csl@csnet-relay
Carl Hewitt		MIT		Hewitt-charter@mc
Mark Hatch		Apollo		hatch@aerospace
Dan Weinreb		Symbolics	DLW@scrc-stonybrook
Rick Hudson		UMass		hudson.umass-cs@csnet-relay
Govind Deshpande	JPL		deshpande@jpl-vlsi.arpa
Beau Sheil		Xerox		sheil@xerox

The first order of business is for each of us to ask people we know who may
be interested in this subgroup if they would like to be added to this list.

Next, we ought to consider who might wish to be the chairman of this subgroup.
Before this happens, I think we ought to wait until the list is more nearly
complete.

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Chairman
Date: 02 Oct 1984 13:19 EST

Now that we've basically got most everyone who is interested on the mailing
list, let's pick a chairman. I suggest that people volunteer for chairman.

The duties are to keep the discussion going, to gather proposals and review
them, and to otherwise administer the needs of the mailing list. I will
retain the duties of maintaining the list itself and the archives, but
otherwise the chairman will be running the show. 

Any takers?
			-rpg-

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  An idea
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12054894948.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Fri, 12 Oct 1984  14:35 EDT
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Fri 12 Oct 84 14:35:46-EDT


Raj Reddy suggested an idea that may or may not be what we want to do,
but is certainly worth thinking about: instead of setting up yet anotehr
non-profit organization to protect our common interests in Common Lisp,
perhaps AAAI would be willing and able to handle this.  The Common Lisp
organization could be set up as a subcommittee or some such.

On the plus side, they are already incorporated and widely recognized,
have some financial and administrative resources that could help to
grease the wheels, and they certainly would help to promote the
user-oriented perspective that some people have found lacking in our
effort to date.  A stable and coherent Common Lisp would certainly help
to promote AI, which is their reason for existing.

On the negative side, it could be argued that Common Lisp and AAAI do
not have identical interests.  Common Lisp is a general purpose
language, not just for AI, and there are plenty of people who believe
that AI in the future will be done in Prolog or in some other dialect of
Lisp.  Also, there might be a problem with tying Common Lisp to a
strictly American organization.  And, of course, AAAI might not want to
touch a politically charged situation like this with a ten-foot pole.

I think that from our side the advantges probably outweigh the
disadvantages, and maybe we should explore this with the current AAAI
management.  Opinions?

- -- Scott

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Chairman
Date: 13 Oct 1984 14:48 EST

No one has been nominated as chairman of the Charter subgroup.  I will
need either a volunteer or a nomination.  Please respond by October 24. At
the end of this month I want to see some ideas and proposals coming in on
this mailing list.

			-rpg-

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Chairman
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12055223548.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sat, 13 Oct 1984  20:40 EDT
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sat 13 Oct 84 20:40:49-EDT


I am interested in the political future of this effort and would be
happy to serve as the chairman of the Charter subcommittee.  I am
currently acting as chairman of the interim executive committee (a.k.a.
the Gang of Five), so I would be glad to step aside if some other
well-qualified candidate steps forward for this.  (By "well qualified",
I mean well-connected to the ARPANET and interested enough to be active
in this role.)  But if nobody else wants this post, I'll do it, since this
particular problem HAS to be solved successfully.

- -- Scott

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Hello folks
Date: 27 Oct 1984 21:56 EST

We now have a chairman of the charter:  Scott Fahlman
of CMU.  I think he will make an excellent chairman.  For your
information I am including the current members of the mailing list.

I will now let Scott take over responsibility for the discussion.

Scott Fahlman		CMU		Fahlman@cmuc
Dave Matthews		HP		"hpfclp!charter%hplabs"@csnet-relay
John Foderaro		Berkeley	jkf@ucbmike.arpa
Gary Brown		DEC		brown@dec-huson
Richard Fateman		Berekely	fateman@berkeley
Martin Griss		HP		griss.hplabs@csnet-relay (I hope)
Joe Ginder		PERQ		Joseph.Ginder@cmu-cs-spice
Dick Gabriel		Stanford/Lucid	rpg@sail
Steve Ford		TI		Ford.ti-csl@csnet-relay
Carl Hewitt		MIT		Hewitt-charter@mc
Mark Hatch		Apollo		hatch@aerospace
Dan Weinreb		Symbolics	DLW@scrc-stonybrook
Rick Hudson		UMass		hudson.umass-cs@csnet-relay
Govind Deshpande	JPL		deshpande@jpl-vlsi.arpa
Beau Sheil		Xerox		sheil@xerox
Neal Feinberg		Symbolics	feinberg@scrc-stony-brook

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Getting started
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12064687113.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sun, 18 Nov 1984  22:05 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sun 18 Nov 84 22:05:44-EST


I guess we had better begin discussing what sort of charter or
organization we want to set up for future control of Common Lisp.  In
fact, I'm already a little late ins ending this out.  Here are some
issues on which I would like to hear your opinions:

1. Do we really need some formal, legal organization to control the
formal definition of Common Lisp, or can we just muddle along as we
have been?

2. If we need a formal organization, what functions should it perform?
A partial list might be: maintain and distribute the "official" langauge
definition and validation suite, be the legal owner of any trademarks or
copyrights that pertain to the language, resolve questions that arise
about the spec, actually perform the valiadations, maintain and
distribute any public-domain libraries or implementor's kits, publish
some sort of newsletter.  Any additions to this list?  Any deletions?

3. Would we be better off setting this up as a separate non-profit
corporation (with all the administrative overhead that this implies), or
is there some existing organization that could handle this.  I pased
along Raj Reddy's suggestion that AAAI might do this.  Should we
investigate that?  Are there other candidates?

4. How would the necessary administrative services be paid for?  DAPRA
has expressed a willingness to provide seed money for Common Lisp
standardization, if necessary, but not to pay for this standardization
forever.  This won't cost much and the companies benefitting from Common
Lisp standardization would probably be willing to pay, but what would be
a fair method of taxation.

5. Here's the hard one: Who has the final say on language-definition
issues?  In most cases, these things can be settled by debate,
compromise, and consensus, but it's important to know what the ultimate
authority is.  Who gets a vote?  How do we divide the power between big
companies, small companies, universities, DOD, random individuals, major
contributors to the original design, users, and so on?  Who, if anyone,
has a veto?  Should this change over time as Common Lisp goes from a
good idea to a widely-used language in which many companies have a major
economic interest?

6. Related to issue 5: Once we know who has ultimate authority, how
should we handle the day-to-day decision-making, both for technical
issues and for administrative issues?  Should we try for a truly
democratic system, or should there be a few elected representatives with
authority to make decisions, subject to review?  Or should we continue
the practice of leaving most decisions to the self-selected group of
people who care enough to participate actively?

Remember: in the end it matters less whether Common Lisp is good
(meaning just the way you want it to be) than that it is standardized
and widely used.  That's where the leverage and the value comes from.
All of you on this mailing list have an interest in these issues, and
many of you represent companies that have a major interest in the
emergence of Common Lisp as a widely-accepted and stable standard.
Please contribute your ideas.  All of us on the "ad hoc interim
executive committee" want to see this language succeed, but at least
some of us are looking forward to retirement (from this role) once the
language is in good hands.

- -- Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Hello?
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12066772996.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Mon, 26 Nov 1984  21:03 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Mon 26 Nov 84 21:03:49-EST


There has been *no* response to my message asking for input on the
general shape of a charter.  Is anyone out there?  Have I asked all the
wrong questions?  Or are these issues just too complex to get started
on?  If I hear nothing more, I'll start work on a proposal matching *MY*
view of how things should work, but I thought that at least a few of you
would like to express some ideas before we get down to debugging a
specific proposal.

At least pop up and say hello, so that I'll know the mailing list is
working.

Your obedient chaircreature,
Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  [fateman%ucbdali: Hello?]
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12066903975.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 27 Nov 1984  09:03 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Tue 27 Nov 84 09:03:18-EST


If I read the following correctly, Fateman believes that there is no
point in trying to set up a standards organization for Common Lisp until
(a) we change the name to something over which we have legal control
(with a year-number in it) and (b) someone settles the issue of
delivery-oriented subsets.  Opinions?

- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
Date: Monday, 26 November 1984  22:52-EST
From: fateman%ucbdali at Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
To:   Fahlman
Re:   Hello?

yeah, the mailing list works.  Any of us who have been involved
in standardization are undoubtedly sour on the idea.  I have already
voiced my objection to the name Common Lisp, which has, in my opinion,
been applied to so many deficient implementations, that the name
has a bogus ring to it.  I vote we start a CL-85 specification,
and encourage DARPA to come up with a Strategic Computing CL-85
specification for a subset strategy.  
You may forward this.

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Charters
Date: 27 Nov 1984 10:28 EST

1. I'm not sure I'm ready to see a formal, legal organization take
over Common Lisp yet. I would be persuadable if there were adequate
checks and balances against random changes. Let me give an example. As you
all know, Rod Brooks and I put together a critique of Common Lisp. In it
we presented some possible criticisms of Common Lisp. The paper was
meant to stimulate thought about the resulting Common Lisp design and
about the design process. I believe that there are people who would take
that paper as a bible and proceed to implement an aggressive subset
strategy, perhaps as a means of making their old stand-by Lisp system
the `real' common Lisp. I would be the first one at the parapets to
fight against that, and perhaps Brooks would be the second. 

Therefore, I want to pursue a conservative strategy in which the current
Common Lisp committee and the members of this subgroup create a strong
document outlining how the language changes and under which circumstances
subsets are allowed  to be called `Common Lisp subsets.'

2. I believe Common Lisp will only succeed if there are excellent
implementations of it. If there are to be public-domain implementor's
kits, I want them to be high quality. I have not seen any Lisp
implementor's kit that I believe satisfies my standards. In order to
get such a kit, I think serious money will need to be thrown at the problem.

I think that one of the Universities - Stanford or CMU - could be funded
to maintain the validation suite.  I think that such an organization is the
perfect place for this role.

On the question of calling a spade a spade, why not get together a minimal
fund or assurances of free advertising which can be used to publish
notices from the Common Lisp watchdog committee about non-Common Lisps.
The idea would be this: The constitution of the CL watchdog committee would
specifiy procedures for confronting a suspected CL bootlegger. The bootlegger
would get an opportunity to explain his plans for getting a real CL together,
or else he would explain in what ways his Lisp is a subset. If he is moving
with due dilligence towards conforming, nothing would happen, except a pat
on the back and the offer of a shoulder to cry on. If the answers are
unsatisfactory, then the watchdog group would simply put an ad in the
AI magazine, SIGART, The Wall Street Journal, etc. stating: Warning,
Megabucks Inc's Lisp is not a common Lisp, it is just Lisp 1.5 with arrays.

3. Lisp's affiliation with AI is touching, but I'm not sure I would want
an AI organization as the watchdog over CL. Especially AAAI. Do you remember
the last Lisp conference? AAAI gave us many assurances that AAAI would not
overlap the Lisp conference. AAAI started their session on tuesday morning,
I believe. They avoided overlapping by having their opening session on
thursday morning. (As an aside, as chairman of the next Lisp conference,
I considered two alternatives: 1) the Lisp conference could hold its
closing ceremonies immediately after the opening ceremonies or 2)
the Lisp conference could be separate. I chose the latter).

Perhaps a non-profit corporation could be set up to do it to help pay for
administrative matters, but, again, I would not support it until there
was a strong CL constitution.

4. I think that the government and the companies should pay for the
adminstration of the CL watchdog. 

5. I think that the CL constitution ought to state the CL design
principles.  For example, the constitution ought to state that CL is a
lexical, multiple-value, etc. Lisp. Then, there ought to be procedures for
undoing those decisions, but doing that ought to be very hard. The minor
points - like EQL instead of EQ for CATCH tags - can be left up to the normal
functions of the watchdog group.

I am, frankly, worried about the power politics involved in all of this.
I know it might sound silly, but I tend to want to model the organization
of the CL world after organization of the US government, *but* only to
the extent of the idealization of a constitutional republic. 

Let me illustrate my concerns.  We could easily posit that companies would
get representation proportional to their size, the size of their
investments, or the percentage of their capital devoted to Common Lisp
activities.

Under any of these schemes, some group would get an unfair amount of
power. Under the first scheme, IBM probably (or Futjitsu) gets the most,
under the second, probably TI gets it, and under the third Lucid gets it.
Now I don't mind other people calling shots, but I do mind if one those
groups, say Lucid, called the shots and it was fundamentally wedged in its
judgement on some point.  How could that group be prevented from forcing
its will on the rest of us? A strong statement of what must remain in CL,
at least in principle, would go a long ways towards that. A second way to
go a long way is to have a distinguished panel of Lisp wizards as a court
of appeal or advice.

6. I don't advocate democracy, and my model reflects that.

			-rpg-

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  Re:  Charters
To:  RPG@SU-AI.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Message-Id:  <8411280412.AA28002@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 27 Nov 84 20:12:18 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.39)

I think the SIGSAM Bulletin might be an appropriate forum for CL activity
(Symbolic and Algebraic Manipulation); though its circulation is not
as large as SIGART.
As the current chairman of SIGSAM, I would encourage this.

Certainly the same problems about proportional representation have occurred
in other standardization efforts, and the same solutions might be appropriate.

--
From:      Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:   Some ideas.
To:        cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Date:      Thu, 29 Nov 84 15:40 EST
Received:  from umass-cs by csnet-relay.csnet id ao06573; 30 Nov 84 12:54 EST


Still here and interested in the charter. In response to your questions

1. Only ANSI and ISO can provide real international legal protection.
   The only argument against using them and a formal standardization
   is the large amount of work required. The amount of protection
   we need could come from our own organization. However, if an
   ISO committee is formed to standardize LISP we would  have to   
   join it to protect our interests. One more note of interest -
   whichever country forms the ISO committee holds the chair
   of that committee.
 
2. The list of organizational duties seems good.

3. The answer of which is more expensive, interfaceing with AAAI or
   going it alone isn't apparent to me. We might have to break
   with AAAI sometime in the future. I think we should go it alone.

4. Lets get seed money from DARPA. Once we have a validation suite lets
   charge companies to be validated. If companies are interested in
   Common Lisp enough to get a system running then they should be able
   to pay for the validation.

5. Tough decisions should be made by voting. A committee could be created
   with a one organization/one (or two?) members. Members would be sent
   from each organization. The rules of the charter should make it clear
   that the members vote as individuals not as companies. This will
   protect both the individuals from problems when they return home
   as well as companies from having company policies set at the meetings.
   It also allows individuals to make decisions without having to
   clear it with the home office. I think such an organization could
   stand the test of time. Noone would have a veto.
   
6. From the above body we could elect (assign on a rotating basis, or
   make it a duty of membership) a small panel to deal with the day to day
   administrative issues. The technical issues could be handled by
   self selected individuals. The voting committee in 5 could OK these
   decisions, turn them down or put them back into the self selected 
   committee, I assume that if someone wants an issue back in committee they
   will want to become part of the committee.

One advantage of this type of set up is that it is simple. Most of the
work will be done by the self appointed committee and just Oked 
by the voting group discussed in 5.

Rick

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 29 Nov 1984  15:40-EST from Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet at csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:  Some ideas.
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@CSNET-RELAY.ARPA>
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12067813293.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Fri, 30 Nov 1984  20:18 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Fri 30 Nov 84 20:18:21-EST


Rick,

Just some reactions to a couple of your comments:

1. I'm not sure what sort of "real international legal protection" you
think ISO and ANSI provides.  Can you elaborate?  Certainly these
organizations lend a certain aura of credibility to any standard, and
credibility is what standards are all about.  On the other hand, I think
most of us have heard enough horror stories about endless, mindless
bureaucracy that we wouldn't touch either of these organizations with
with a ten-foot simple bit-vector.

4. I'm not sure that trying to support this organization through
validation fees is a good idea.  Validation should pay for its own
expenses, but adding a lot of extra cost to the process might deter
companies from getting formal validation.  We don't want a lot of
companies running around saying that their systems are perfect Common
Lisp but that they skipped the formal validation because they couldn't
see paying the extra $30K or whatever.  Besides, it seems unfair to make
the providers of Common Lisp systems shoulder the whole burden while
providers of applications and assorted users get a free ride (but
still want to have a say in the decisions).  I'd be more inclined to
favor a dues system for institutional members, with maybe a couple of
tiers so that little startup companies are not deterred from
participating.

- -- Scott

--
From:      Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:   Legal Protection
To:        cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Date:      Tue, 4 Dec 84 11:31 EST
Received:  from umass-cs by csnet-relay.csnet id aj28943; 5 Dec 84 1:08 EST

Scott,

By 'international legal protection' I just meant that if an ISO standard
is ever done we would be best protected if the chair of the
ISO Lisp standards committee were held by the U.S. As far as I know
the only agreements we have with other countries is that if an ISO standard
exists for something then we will not create an ANSI standard for the same
thing. 

I just talked to the chair of the APL standardization
committee and heard war stories that have convinced me not to want
to be involved with ANSI or ISO. 

 Rick

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  Re:  Legal Protection
To:  cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Message-Id:  <8412050645.AA28156@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 4 Dec 84 22:45:12 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.39)

Say,  Did we ever find out about the Digital Press copyright on the
manual?

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Cc:  cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA, ohlander@usc-isi
Subject:  CL the copyright
To:  steele@cmuc
Message-Id:  <8412070636.AA26142@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Thu, 6 Dec 84 22:36:22 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.39)

Has anything happened with this?  In particular, a CL implementation
reference manual for a particular machine would probably benefit from
following the organization of the book (so far as possible), chapter &
verse, stating choices where they were made, providing more specifics
on errors, extensions, etc.
  If Digital Equipment Corp., through its ownership of Digital Press,
were made uniquely able to do this, it would seem unfortunate.
  Is perhaps an earlier version that was GLS copyrighted, more
available?  Is there an on-line copy?

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 7 Dec 1984  01:36-EST from fateman%ucbdali at Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  CL the copyright
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, steele@TL-20B.ARPA
To:    fateman%ucbdali@位Berkeley (Richard Fateman)位
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12069533951.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Fri, 7 Dec 1984  09:50 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Fri 7 Dec 84 09:50:15-EST


The last I heard, about a month ago, the people at DARPA (along with
Guy) were negotiating with Digital Press to reclaim the copyright so
that the licensing of online versions, implementation-specific manuals,
etc. would be in more neutral hands.  Digital Press seemed willing to do
something like that as long as they retained some sort of exclusive
rights for publication of the manual in implementation-independent book
form -- they would be giving up a bunch of other rights which they now
have by contract.  DARPA has some legal claim to rights to earlier
versions of the manual, but as long as Digital Press is willing to
cooperate, nobody wants to make it a battle of lawyers.

I haven't heard lately how these negotiations are going, however.

- -- Scott

--
From:  Ohlander
In-Reply-To:  <8412070636.AA26142@ucbdali.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]10-Dec-84 08:57:25.OHLANDER>
Cc:  steele@CMU-CS-C.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  fateman%ucbdali@UCB-VAX.ARPA
Subject:  Re: CL the copyright
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  10 Dec 1984 08:57-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 10 Dec 84  05:57:46 PST

Steve Squires and I have talked to Sam Fuller at DEC about this
issue and I think we have closure.  After Guy Steele had sent a
letter to John Osborne of Digital Press, Sam Fuller got together
the Digital Press people and also explained the problem.  As a
result, there is some tentative agreement that DEC will allow
other companies to reproduce the Common Lisp manual for a
reasonable fee.  In addition they won't have to go through all
this format nonsense.  It was also agreed that DEC would have
commercial rights while the Common Lisp group maintains rights to
the Common Lisp specification.  DEC will also accomodate any
changes in the specification made by the Common Lisp group.  This
has yet to be ratified with John Osborne but I don't think there
will be any major difficulty.

Ron Ohlander

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 18 Dec 1984  14:27-EST from Daniel L. Weinreb <DLW at SCRC-QUABBIN.ARPA>
Subject:  One idea.
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    "Daniel L. Weinreb" <DLW@SCRC-QUABBIN.ARPA>
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12072813587.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Wed, 19 Dec 1984  22:05 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Wed 19 Dec 84 22:05:51-EST


I agree more or less with Weinreb's suggestion.  It's too late to get
control of the name "Common Lisp", even if this were clearly desirable.
What we can do is come up with some sort of trademark associated with
"Validated Common Lisp 84" or whatever, and protect that carefully.

If we do it this way, companies will be able to use the name "Common
Lisp" meaning that they aspire to produce something that is Common Lisp
compatible, much as companies use variations on the name "Unix" to
indicate what kind of operating system they are providing.  If someone
claims that their product is Common Lisp, it will be fair for the
community and for reviewers to evaluate it on how close it comes to
meeting the spec.  But companies will only be able to sue the trademark
for Validated Common Lisp if they in fact have been officially
validated.

- -- Scott

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Charter
Date: 26 Dec 1984 15:33 EST

After reading Scott's message, which hinted at a potential charter
proposal he may write, I was thinking further about my loathing
of democracies and the possible dangers to Common Lisp if we go for
such a system.

But first, some other comments.

1) Why do we need a non-profit organization that needs ARPANET access?  We
possibly need such an organization to shield us as individuals from
lawsuits.  And I can almost see that we might need such an organization to
provide dollars for travel to meeting places. But why ARPANET access? Will that
organization be manned? (!) And what will the person who mans the organization
do every day? I presume that what we'll need is an organization in a city
where one of the permanently interested Common Lisp people can have a 
post office box and a bank account.

2) We've always dealt with issues by ARPANET before; why can't we do that now?
The number of new accounts that are needed for people who do not now have
ARPANET access is pretty small, and the bulk of the costs of those accounts
can be paid for either by the companies involved or by DARPA for the individuals
involved.

3) Validation could form the basis of a `company,' and for that we should
possibly charge a validation fee, and DARPA can pay for the rest of the
validation activities. Perhaps we could study how ADA is validated (or
not validated) to understand how to win (or how to not lose).

Now on to voting.

When we were doing the original design, we relied on consensus, not on voting.
We voted from time to time, but we accepted the results of the vote as binding
in those cases in which we had agreed by consensus to accept them.  We didn't
trust voting then, and I don't think we should trust it now. We ought to
allow voting for getting the sense of how people feel, and for simple
decisions voting is ok, but for any sort of major decisions I think
we would be nuts to use it.

If companies are paying to send members to a standards meeting, then you
can bet that it will be tough for some people to dissociate themselves from
their companies. It is nice to think that people will be able to put themselves
in the larger context to vote on the issues qua issues, but I'd rather have the 
structure set up to enforce this.

There are two ways I can think of, and they are similar to each other. The first
is a statement of principles, which states exactly what it is that makes
Common Lisp a Common Lisp. In some sense we want that definition to change
is needed, but we want to guarantee that the rate of change will be small for
most of the language. And we want some parts to move very slowly indeed.

The principles would state that Common Lisp is a lexical Lisp and, for example,
that a dynamic Lisp is not to be interpretted as a subset of Common Lisp.
Similarly it would also talk about multiple values, lambda-lists, and the
general principles, which Steele stated in the Common Lisp book.

There would then be a body that would decide for every change made to
Common Lisp whether that change followed the principles. If not, then the
change would not go into effect. This body could also serve an advisory
role with respect to other Common Lisp activities.

The second way is a simplification of this, which is to have an oligarchy.
The members of the oligarchy would be chosen for their `stature' and 
`Lisp wisedom.' A second body would be a suggestion-generator. This second
body would come up with proposals, and the oligarchy would decide what to do.
This is almost the same as the first suggestion, but there is no set of 
principles that form the basis of the decisions made by the oligarchic
body.

On the subject of dues, it might be the case that some small startups cannot
afford, say, $20k right off the bat. These companies might like to offer
services rather than dollars in order to `belong' to the Common Lisp Group.
That is, they could run mailing lists, work on validation suites, or something
until their ship comes in.

			-rpg-

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  Re:  Charter
To:  RPG@SU-AI.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Message-Id:  <8412280424.AA07636@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Thu, 27 Dec 84 20:24:22 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.40)

1. I will point out that being rigid on what 
is or is not a common lisp subset is perhaps not to our benefit.

2. Do you want to tackle Gold Hill and Symbolics regarding lexical
scoping?  What about flavors? How about a standard editor? I doubt that any of
us want someone (else) dictating, retroactively, what should be in or out 
of a CL implementation, especially after ours has been released. I'd bet
there would some delicate legal issues, and I would expect that
anyone who cared to make a fuss about a rejection from the CL club
would sue the pants off the organization.

3. It was my impression that the "Strategic Computing"
Common Lisp subset would probably be a subset of several already existing
lisps, including Maclisp and Interlisp.

4. What would happen if we just stopped at this point?  It would be as though
people had a new "lisp 1.5" model on which to base their lisp systems.
This is a good thing:
Just as the lisps between 1959 and (more or less) 1984 could be said to
be based on lisp 1.5 (more or less), the lisps after 1984 could be said
to be based on common lisp (more or less).

5. Should we really go further?
Is there an important role for the CL charter group (or validation group?)
to play in the de-validation of purported common lisps? Or the stomping on
professed non-common lisps (e.g. Maclisp, Interlisp)?  If DARPA has expressed
a need for this service, they should provide specs and offer to pay for
it.  Otherwise, our work here seems to be done!

6. As we continue to muddle around for a while longer while
a few more alleged CL implementations appear, we will be even more likely
to fall into this position.  It might not be a bad situation as I indicated
in paragraph 4.

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 27 Dec 1984  23:24-EST from fateman%ucbdali at Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  Charter
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    fateman%ucbdali@位Berkeley (Richard Fateman)位
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12075028504.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Fri, 28 Dec 1984  08:52 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Fri 28 Dec 84 08:52:41-EST


As tempting as your suggestion is -- I would love to declare a victory
and go home -- I don't think that Common Lisp will solve the problems we
want it to solve if we just let it float free from now on, in the manner
of Lisp 1.5.  While that did give the world a rough idea of what was
meant by the word "Lisp", it also left room for a major schism and
enough chaos in the Lisp world to effectively prevent most people in
industry and government from embracing Lisp as a usable language.
That's what we're trying to get away from.  So we've got to be tighter
than that if Common Lisp is to be "industrial strength".

As for companies getting upset when we finally have a validation suite
for what's in the book and their Lisp doesn't make it, well, they
shouldn't be surprised.  They can probably still call themselves "Common
Lisp", but they just won't be able to claim that they're fully validated
or to sell their systems to people who require that.  If an organization
forms, sets some standards, offers to validate conformance with those
standards, and if other organizations decide to require conformance to
that particular set of standards, I don't see any grounds for a lawsuit
(which is not to say that there won't be any, given the unreasonable
nature of lawyers).

As for Symbolics and Gold Hill, I believe that Symbolics plans to come
into full compliance, including lexical scoping, and that Gold Hill
clearly understands that as long as they are a subset they are not going
to get validated as a full Common Lisp anyway.  My guess is that they
will move to lexical scoping sometime soon -- it's not THAT hard.
Flavors and standard editors and such are not part of the language spec
proper, though they may someday have specs of their own which companies
can meet or reject, as they choose.

- -- Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  A proposal
Cc:    quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, squires@USC-ISI.ARPA
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12081472823.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Mon, 21 Jan 1985  22:52 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Mon 21 Jan 85 22:52:33-EST


OK, we've got to get this charter business settled.  The status quo is
untenable in the long run.  I guess we need a specific proposal to focus
our discussions.  There seem to be three possible models:

1. A separate organization for Common Lisp.

2. Setting up a subcommittee of AAAI or some other existing organization
   to handle Common Lisp activities.

3. Trying to get by without any formal organization.  Guy would put
   whatever he wants into future editions of the book, DARPA would
   specify whatever they want as a standard (with a validation suite
   owned by them), CMU and others might produce some public domain code
   if they feel like it, manufacturers do whatever they want to and call
   it Common Lisp if they feel like it, and the rest of us kibitz and
   try to offer good but informal advice to all of the above.

I think that most of us prefer plan 1, a separate organization, if such
an organization can be set up in some way that makes it viable.
Therefore, I propose to explore in this document what such an
organization might look like.  If we can't find a satisfactory solution
of this form, then it is time to look at the other options.

I share the concern expressed by Dick Gabriel (and by James Madison and
Alexander Hamilton) that raw democracy is not the best way to decide
complex technical issues.  The traditional fix is to set up a
representative system in which the decisions are made by a small group
of people who are elected by, and derive their legitimacy from, the
community as a whole.  We also need some constitutional checks and
balances to prevent any sudden and disruptive lurches in the design.
All of us have our own axes to grind, but I think that most of us feel
that overall stability of the language is of over-riding importance.

The following proposal is just a sketch.  Random comments and queries
are in square brackets.  Obviously it will take a certain amount of
work, by someone with experience in such organizational matters, to turn
this outline into a proper set of bylaws.  Since there is significant
money involved, as well as a number of liability and antitrust issues,
we're going to need good legal advice on this BEFORE we start signing up
members.  That's one place where the DARPA seed money comes in, I hope.

Let me know what you think about this.  I'm not particularly attached to
any of the details of this plan.  Alternative plans are welcome.  Keep
in mind that we've got to do SOMETHING about an organization, so vague
objections that are not accompanied by reasonable counter-proposals
won't be taken very seriously.

- -- Scott

- ---------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. OVERVIEW

The proposal is to create a non-profit corporation to be called the
"Common Lisp Association".  The purpose of this organization is to
promote the standardization and orderly evolution of the Common Lisp
language and to support efforts to enhance the usefulness of all Common
Lisp implementations.

This organization will have both individual and corporate members.  The
dues from the corporate members will be its principal source of income.

2. FUNCTIONS OF THE ASSOCIATION

2.1 To maintain and distribute the official language definition and a
matching validation suite.  This involves a certain amount of
decision-making to resolve ambiguities in the manual, consider proposed
changes and extensions and perhaps adopt them, and to create related
standards in areas outside the language proper.  All decisions must be
carefully recorded and communicated to all interested parties.

2.2 To serve as the legal entity that acts on behalf of the Common Lisp
community.  In this capacity, the organization would be the holder of
any trademarks or copyrights that are under control of "the Common Lisp
community" and not of any single company or group.  In particular, the
organization will obtain a trademark for "Validated Common Lisp", and
will control its use.

2.3 To perform official validation of Common Lisp implementations.  Only
those implementations that have passed an official validation test at
some level will be authorized to use the "Validated Common Lisp"
trademark.  From time to time, new validation suites will be produced,
and anyone using the trademark will be required to include an
appropriate explanation, such as "Complies fully with the 1986 Common
Lisp Standard, minus complex numbers".

2.4 To maintain and distribute any software libraries, implementor's
kits, or other materials whose authors want them to be generally
available without cost to the Common Lisp community.  If the resources
of the organization are sufficient, the organization may help to fund
the production of new materials (programs, documentation, training
materials, etc.) whose existence would be of benefit to the Common Lisp
community as a whole.

2.5 To disseminate news of general interest to the Common Lisp
community, normally by electronic mail, but with hardcopy service
available for those members who need this.

2.6 To organize meetings whenever these are necessary.  The organization
may pay the travel expenses of officers and members of the executive
council and technical committee to attend these meetings.

In order to perform these functions, the organization will require a
certain amount of technically competent clerical help.  It will also
need good access to the Arpanet and CSnet, a substantial amount of
online storage for records, code, and documents, and some facilities for
producing hardcopy documents and mag tapes.  There is probably not
enough clerical and administrative work at present to keep a full-time
office staff busy; on the other hand, I can state from personal
experience that to do this administrative work right requires more time
than we can count on getting from random volunteers, especially if they
are busy Lisp wizards with projects and deadlines of their own.  So, for
the near future, it seems best to have the organization contract with
someone else to provide the necessary equipment and administrative
services for a fee -- perhaps one of the universities or some company
like Lucid.

3. CLASSES OF MEMBERSHIP

3.1 Individual Members

An individual may join the association as an individual member by
payment of the annual dues.  The amount of dues will be set by the
executive council, but I propose $25/year as the initial amount.  The
idea is that the individual dues should be just high enough to pay for
the administrative costs of communicating with the users.

[ Would we get a higher percentage of "serious" Lisp people if the
individual dues were higher?  Does it matter?  On the one hand we want
to popularize the language; on the other hand, a lot of damage could be
done if the organization were flooded by people whose main interest is
how well Common Lisp runs on their Commodore 64's.  Maybe the checks and
balances described below will suffice to keep the design reasonably
stable.  If not, one nasty trick would be to charge a low price for people
reachable by Arpanet or CSnet, and a higher price for those reachable
only by physical mail. ]

Individual members have certain voting rights, as described below.  They
receive all communications that are sent to the membership at large
(either by electronic mail or, if they so request, by physical mail).
They also may obtain libraries, implementor's kits, and any other
public-domain information maintained by the association for only the
cost of preparing and shipping the media to them.  Finally, there will
occasionally be meetings of the membership (though it may be necessary
to charge an additional registration fee for these meetings to cover
expenses).

3.2 Corporate Members

Any corporation or other organization can join the association as a
corporate member by paying the annual dues.  Membership by a corporation
does not necessarily imply that the corporation favors the use of Common
Lisp over other Lisp dialects or other programming languages, but merely
that the corporation favors the standardization of Common Lisp and wishes
to support that effort and to participate in it.

[ Do we allow foreign companies to join?  I hope so.  If possible, we
want Common Lisp to be a worldwide standard, not just a U.S. standard.
Universities and U. S. government agencies would probably not want to be
corporate members, but would just have some people join up as
individuals. ]

It is the dues of the corporate members that support the organization
and its activities, so these dues are significant.  Again, it is the
executive council that sets the dues, but I believe that the initial
level should be $10,000/year for each corporate member.  Assuming that
we get at least ten such members and can obtain the necessary services
at favorable rates, the organization should be on a reasonably secure
financial footing.  There would presumably be some DARPA money keeping
the organization afloat at the start, and once it's running well there
might be many more than ten corporate members -- there certainly are
more than twenty companies working on Common Lisp or closely related
products.

Corporate members receive the following benefits:

* Certain special voting rights, as described below.  Each corporation
  will designate one person to act as its representative in such votes.
  This person will receive all the rights of individual membership,
  whether or not he or she is an individual member.

* Free access to the Common Lisp materials maintained by the
  association, and assistance of the administrative staff in obtaining
  these items.

* Official validation of any Common Lisp product they might produce for
  only the cost of running the tests.

* Free use of the Validated Common Lisp trademark in advertising for
  products that have been duly validated.

* The list of current corporate members will be included in some
  materials released by the association, so that we can all be grateful
  to those companies who have paid their fair share.

If a company that is not a corporate member of the association wants to
have an implementation validated and to use the trademark, the fee is
$11,000 per year, plus costs.  This fee may be waived for any
implementation that is distributed for free or for a price that only
covers the distribution costs.

[OK, how many out there believe that your companies would join up as
corporate members under the scheme described here?  How sensitive is
this decision to the amount of the dues?]

4. GOVERNANCE

[ All of this needs to be polished up.  Does anyone have a copy of some
similar association's bylaws?  We may as well copy some existing model
rather than reinventing the wheel. ]

The basic idea is that the organization will require the usual
complement of officers (president, vice-president, and
secretary-treasurer), along with an executive council of six [?]
members.  Administrative issues and any major expenditures of the
organization's funds will be decided by majority vote of this group
(officers plus councillors).  No more than two of the executive
councillors may be employed by any one company, university, or other
organization.

The officers are elected annually; the council members serve
two-year terms, with half the members being elected each year.  These
officers and councilors are elected by the individual members.  The
balloting will be done by electronic and physical mail, according to the
preference of each member.  Prior to the election, the existing
executive council and officers will nominate at least one candidate for
each opening; any corporate member or any group of five [?] individual
members may put forth additional nominees whose names will be included
on the ballots.

Technical issues relating to the Common Lisp specification or related
specifications are decided by the seven-member Technical Committee, as
described below.  The members of this committee serve two-year terms,
with half being elected each year.  [The number seven is arbitrary, but
it wants to be an odd number and does NOT want to be five.]  No more
than two members of the Technical Committee may be employed by any one
company, university, or other organization.  Technical Committee members
may also be officers of the association, but no one may serve on both
the technical committee and the executive council at once.  The
nomination and balloting procedures are the same for the technical
committee as for the executive council.

It is essential that the organization do whatever is necessary to
protect the councillors, committee members, and officers from any legal
actions that might arise in relation to their activities on behalf of
the organization.  Unless this protection can be made fairly airtight,
it's going to be awfully hard to find volunteers.

5. TECHNICAL DECISIONS

We begin by accepting the language description in "Common Lisp: The
Language" by Guy L. Steele Jr., in the first edition as published by
Digital Press, as the initial authoritative language definition for
Common Lisp.  The "current definition" of Common Lisp is this book, as
modified by any duly approved amendments or clarifications, until such
time as a new comprehensive document is approved.  At any given time,
the association will make available to members all those documents
which, taken together, constitute the current official definition of the
language.  Any validation tests approved by the association will (try
to) conform to this official language definition.

The issues to be considered by the technical committee will be
classified into four categories, as follows:

1. Proposed changes and extensions to the current official Common Lisp
   definition.

2. Clarifications, where in the opinion of the the technical committee
   the current definition is ambiguous, inconsistent, or clearly
   unworkable.

3. Validation issues, concerning whether the validation tests properly
   reflect the current language definition.

4. Related standards, not part of the Common Lisp definition itself.

The decision process is as follows: 

First, the issue is raised by the technical committee and is
communicated to the membership.  A recommendation may be sent out at
this time as well.  All members are invited to express their views on
the issue, but the decision is made by the technical committee.

After a discussion period of at least fourteen days, the technical
committee, by majority vote, will make a decision, and the result will
be communicated to the members.

Any corporate member may challenge a decision by the technical committee
by calling for a vote of the corporate members.  This challenge must
occur within two weeks of the announcement of that decision.  If a
majority of the corporate members vote to veto the decision, it is set
aside.  In the case of a proposed change, extension, or related
standard, the status quo prevails; in the case of a clarification or
validation issue, the decision is, in effect sent back into committee.
If a decision is not challenged within two weeks, or if it is not vetoed
by a majority of the corporate members, it is adopted.

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@UCB-VAX (Richard Fateman)
Cc:  ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA, squires@USC-ISI.ARPA
Subject:  Re:  A proposal
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Message-Id:  <8501220517.AA23652@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Mon, 21 Jan 85 21:17:42 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.40)

actually, (3) seems much simpler; (2) could evolve in an orderly fashion
over a long period of time into an ANSI Standard Common Lisp committee
under the auspices of IEEE; and (1), the proposal you favor, would probably
cost $50k in legal fees just to start up. That's not even counting the
legal fees of the companies outside CL Inc. who must analyze the rules
before joining.
  I think that unless CL Inc owns the copyright to GLS's book, the exercise
is totally at the mercy of Digital Press.  Would D.P. sell the copyright
to CL Inc.?  If so, the royalties accruing might support a small staff.

   Why, after all this, is (3) not so bad?  Well, look at what happened
to Lisp 1.5, and the little MIT press blue&white book describing it.
Was that so bad?  Did anyone ever validate a lisp 1.5 implementation?
If DARPA wants to specify to contractors that their application deliverables 
must be "Common Lisp compatible", or "Strategic-Computing Lisp compatible",
then they need not be written in a full "Validated Common Lisp", but
could (for example) be written in any subset, or any Lisp whatsoever that
by Turing-equivalence could be simulated in a CL system.

IF you continue to try for plan (1) and include this corporate thing
then the current group of interested people will quite certainly lose control
of CL to the extent that it becomes commercially important. Imagine the
vetoes from Hughes, Lockheed, Boeing, General Dynamics, GE, Aerospace, Ford,
GM, Chrysler, United Industries, Fujitsu, Mitsubishi... in addition to
the more cost-conscious of the computer vendors.

  I suggest that only individuals be allowed to vote, as is the case with
IEEE standards committees.

--
From:  STEELE@TL-20A.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  Message from ""Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>" of Mon 21 Jan 85 23:18:13-EST
cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA,
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: A proposal
Date:  Tue 22 Jan 85 13:15:38-EST
Received:  ID <STEELE@TL-20A.ARPA.#Internet>; Tue 22 Jan 85 13:15:46-EST

While stability is well and good, I am also concerned that the natural
conservatism of the corporate interests may stifle necessary improvements,
particularly clarifications and resolutions of contradictions, in the
long run.  I would like to suggest either of two modifications for
consideration:
(1) Corporate veto requires a two-thirds majority of corporate members.
(2) Corporate veto requires only simple majority, but the veto can be
    overridden by unanimous vote of the technical committee.
I thought of (1) first, but I slightly favor (2), the point being that
that involves an extra step and therefore gives the technical committee
feedback on how corporate members feel before making the final decision.
(Perhaps the word "unanimous" should be changed to "three-quarters
majority" in (2), especially if the technical committee is larger than
ten people.  Three-quarters majorities for odd numbers of people are:
6 of 7; 7 of 9; 9 of 11; 10 of 13; 12 of 15.  But this is premature
fine-tuning.)
- -------

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  A proposal
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA,
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12082785776.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sat, 26 Jan 1985  23:04 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sat 26 Jan 85 23:04:42-EST


So far, I've only received two replies to my charter proposal, one from
Guy Steele and one from Richard Fateman.  That means either that (a) all
the rest of you agree with my proposal in all its details, (b) all of
you find it so hopelessly wrong that it's not worth commenting on, (c)
none of you give a damn about these issues, or (d) you people out in
companies only read your mail once a month.  At least let me know which
of these is really the case.

Fateman favors going with no formal organization at all, in part because
he believes that the legal fees will be overwhelming if we try to start
such a thing.  Does anyone have some hard data on the legal costs for
similar efforts?

To answer another of Fateman's queries, I think that Digital Press would
be quite willing to turn the copyright over to the organization, once it
is up and running, as long as they retain the exclusive rights to
publish the manual in commercial book form.  They have suggested as much
in preliminary discussions, though there are a large number of details
to be worked out.  We can't proceed with anything like this until there
is some entity with whom they can make the deal.

We come finally, to the central point:

     Why, after all this, is (3) not so bad?  Well, look at what happened
  to Lisp 1.5, and the little MIT press blue&white book describing it.
  Was that so bad?  Did anyone ever validate a lisp 1.5 implementation?

In my opinion, it was "so bad".  The lack of a usable standard
for Lisp 1.5, and some way of updating that standard as Lisp evolved
into something whose relation to Lisp 1.5 was almost unrecognizable, was
responsible for a couple of major schisms and a huge amount of duplicated
effort.  The resulting chaotic situation probably set the
commercialization of AI back by 5 years or so.

Finally, Fateman argues that a separate organization would make it
inevitable that the original group of Common Lisp people would lose
control of the language as more and more companies develop a strong
commercial interest in it.  That seems like a desirable evolution to me.
Who better to control the language than those who have a stake in it?
If the language becomes too stable over time, we researchers will just
have to call our wild new languages something else.

Both Fateman and Steele have expressed some uneasiness over the veto
power that I proposed for the industrial members, on the grounds that
such companies would tend to be too conservative.  I think that both of
you are selling the companies short.  I have not noticed any tendency of
the companies involved in this process to be more conservative than
anyone else.  On a lot of issues I've been the conservative, or Gabriel
has, or Hedrick or Fateman -- academics all (at the time).  Where people
from the stock-hardware companies have felt that they lacked expertise
on some issue, they have generally kept quiet.  I see no reason to
believe that this would change.  Of course the companies will resist any
expensive changes for which there is not a clear benefit to be gained,
but so will the rest of us -- that's what stability is all about.

Note that I am NOT proposing that any single company, or small group of
them, be given a veto.  That would be disastrous.  But if the technical
committee cannot persuade at least half of the companies that some change
is worthwhile, it seems to me that the change should not go through.
Note also that even a majority of the companies could not force through
a lot of changes that would ruin the existing language, unless they also
gain control of the technical committee.  The pressure to come up with
subsets and compromises will evaporate after a year or two; by then,
most companies will be offering full Common Lisp implementations and
will no longer have much interest in reverting to dynamic scoping or
flushing all of the sequence functions.

The reason for including this veto provision in the first place is that,
when I try to look at this organization from the point of view of the
companies who want to invest heavily in Common Lisp, I see a need for
some protection against the technical committee (a small group of
people, after all) going crazy and changing the language beyond all
recognition, destroying my investment.  To spin out just one disturbing
fantasy, some company that does not want to see Common Lisp succeed
might try to pack the association with its employees as individual
members, elect a technical committee of its own liking, and hijack the
language definition machinery.  The mere existence of a veto power by
the other corporate members would eliminate this threat, I think.

For those reasons, I would oppose giving the technical committee the
final word by giving them the power to over-ride vetos.  It wouldn't
bother me to require a 2/3 majority of corporate members for a veto, but
I prefer a simple majority.  As a practical matter, I think that any
technical committee would be mad to shove through any change that is not
acceptable to a majority of the companies, even if they had the power to
do so.

- -- Scott

--
From:  David A. Moon <Moon@SCRC-RIVERSIDE.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <850127004201.8.MOON@EUPHRATES.SCRC.Symbolics.COM>
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12082785776.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA,
To:  Scott E. Fahlman <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  A proposal
Date:  Sun, 27 Jan 85 00:42 EST
Received:  from SCRC-EUPHRATES by SCRC-STONY-BROOK via CHAOS with CHAOS-MAIL id 166927; Sun 27-Jan-85 00:42:42-EST

    Date: Sat, 26 Jan 1985  23:04 EST
    From: "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>

    So far, I've only received two replies to my charter proposal, one from
    Guy Steele and one from Richard Fateman.  That means either that (a) all
    the rest of you agree with my proposal in all its details, (b) all of
    you find it so hopelessly wrong that it's not worth commenting on, (c)
    none of you give a damn about these issues, or (d) you people out in
    companies only read your mail once a month.  At least let me know which
    of these is really the case.

(c).  Note that I am not on the CL-Charter mailing list.  Other people at
Symbolics are on that mailing list, perhaps they will speak up.  Some of
them are extremely busy this month trying to get out a software release
on time and with an acceptable level of bugs, so maybe that explains the
delay.  I am sure the "official" position of Symbolics is not (c).

The rest of your message seems reasonable to me.

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  Re:  A proposal
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA,
Message-Id:  <8501270741.AA26395@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Sat, 26 Jan 85 23:41:09 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.40)

	Fateman favors going with no formal organization at all, in part because
	he believes that the legal fees will be overwhelming if we try to start
	such a thing.  Does anyone have some hard data on the legal costs for
	similar efforts?
I am sure that the costs would be higher for anything "original" 
(as opposed to what has been done with Fortran, COBOL, Basic, Pascal, MUMPS).
I wonder if the extra cost would buy much.
	
	To answer another of Fateman's queries, I think that Digital Press would
	be quite willing to turn the copyright over to the organization, once it
	is up and running, as long as they retain the exclusive rights to
	publish the manual in commercial book form.
Whose manual?  CommonLisptheLanguage is not a reference manual.  Where, for
example, are the error messages? The debugger?  It is an incomplete work.
I agree that there are a large number of details to be worked out, but there
are some major issues, too.  To what extent does DEC own all "composite" works?
Would DEC permit a "composite" to remove sections or paragraphs ... e.g.
to change the meaning of a function ..  or to use dynamic rather than
lexical scope? Or would DEC be the de facto standard setter by saying that
if you alter anything you must write the manual from scratch?
	
	The lack of a usable standard
	for Lisp 1.5, and some way of updating that standard as Lisp evolved
	into something whose relation to Lisp 1.5 was almost unrecognizable, was
	responsible for a couple of major schisms and a huge amount of duplicated
	effort.  The resulting chaotic situation probably set the
	commercialization of AI back by 5 years or so.
I guess I disagree.  The effort to make an Interlisp program run in a
Maclisp system, or vice versa strikes me as not so great.  Few people
have wanted to use other people's "magnum opus" programs as components in 
their systems.  The fact that some were Interlisp and others Maclisp
is irrelevant.  The smaller programs... tools like the BBN/Interlisp/CMU-Franz
structure editor or flavors .. have been moved.  In spite of the biennial
Crisis-in-Lisp meetings, I am not sure anyone can point to any great
waste of human effort in retargeting.  It's been mostly religion, and
all we see now is Maclisp is in the ascendancy.

Perhaps this is not the place to discuss the question, but do you have
in mind some "commercial AI program of today" that might have been out
5 years earlier? Certainly Macsyma would not have been affected by this
issue.  I doubt that KEE would have been.
I think hardware has been much more critical.
	
	The pressure to come up with
	subsets and compromises will evaporate after a year or two; by then,
	most companies will be offering full Common Lisp implementations and
	will no longer have much interest in reverting to dynamic scoping or
	flushing all of the sequence functions.
I doubt it. Do you think IBM PCs and Macintoshes will evaporate in 2 years?
	
	To spin out just one disturbing
	fantasy, some company that does not want to see Common Lisp succeed
	might try to pack the association with its employees as individual
	members, elect a technical committee of its own liking, and hijack the
	language definition machinery.
How has this been avoided in Fortran or ... committees?  Why are you assuming
we must break new ground?
	
I too would like to hear from the others..

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  A proposal
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA,
To:    fateman%ucbdali@位Berkeley (Richard Fateman)位
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12082936705.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sun, 27 Jan 1985  12:53 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sun 27 Jan 85 12:53:47-EST


Richard,

  I am sure that the costs would be higher for anything "original" 
  (as opposed to what has been done with Fortran, COBOL, Basic, Pascal, MUMPS).
  I wonder if the extra cost would buy much.

Well, our situation is unique in some ways, I think, but I certainly
don't want to invent any more of this than is necessary.  One reason I'm
uneasy about chairing this group is that I've carefully avoided
standardization committees and other such political groups in the past,
so I'm not very well acquainted with some of these earlier efforts.  All
that I've heard about them have been a lot of horror stories.  If anyone
can point to an existing model that they think is worth emulating, and
to some way of getting the details on it, I'd love to copy something
successful. 

On the manual issue, the Common Lisp organization would control the
content and any additions.  Digital Press has never wanted to control
the content of they manual; they have tried to faithfully follow our
request that nobody be allowed to reprint the manual with random
mutations of their own choosing.  I think that Digital Press would be
satisfied with any arrangement in which, if some composite work is to be
published as a commercial book, they either do the publishing or get a
roylaty on the part of the work they now control.  The problem with
licensing legitimate derivitive works has been the low bandwidth of our
interations with Digital Press, the slow pace at which Digital Press
does anything, and some confusion about who speaks for the Common Lisp
community.  If the organization were to gain control of the copyright,
these problems would be greatly alleviated.  In fact, that's one of the
biggest reasons why we ought to move fast on this charter business and
not let it sit for a year.

As for the "5 years earlier" issue, I wasn't terribly close to Macsyma,
but it is probably a good example of a program that would have found its
way into industry many years ago if the Lisp that it ran on was stable,
well-documented, and ran more or less compatibly on a variety of
machines.  When I was at MIT, eight or so years ago, I heard many rumors
of industrial groups looking into Macsyma and other early Maclisp-based
systems and giving up when they saw what kind of shape Maclisp was in.
(Some of them probably were driven away by MIT's lawyers instead, but
that's another problem.)

I don't think that Macintoshes and IBM PC's will have disappeared in two
years, but I am quite sure that virtual-memory PC's, capable of running
a full Common Lisp with editor and compiler, will exist within that time
frame at prices comparable to today's Macintoshes and PC's.  There will
be plenty of non-VM personal computers still running -- older machines
or super-cheap ones -- but there will be plenty of clean,
well-considered subsets of Common Lisp running on these machines.

Right now, most of the pressure for substantially altering Common Lisp
comes not from the small-machine people, but from those trying to turn
some already-existing Lisp into Common Lisp by bending it a little.
This is the game that I think will be over within a year or two.  By
then, these people will either have succeeded in developing a legal
Common Lisp from wherever they are starting, or will have been blown
away by some from-scratch Common Lisp implementation for the same
machine.

- -- Scott

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA,
Subject:  Re:  A proposal
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA, fateman%ucbdali%位Berkeley位@Berkeley
Message-Id:  <8501280106.AA00855@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Sun, 27 Jan 85 17:06:25 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.40)

Is it your intention to forbid a lisp manual to use the CL chapter
on packages [paying suitable royalties], if the lisp in question
neglects to adopt the string chapter? How about lexical scoping?  
Is this DEC's intention too?  I guess I would be happier if the manual
were put in the public domain, and the imprimateur of the CL committee
was separate.

P.S...apologies for the tangent...but...
Macsyma's distribution problems have been caused by
hardware and legal issues, not divisiveness in languages. Had Macsyma
run in Interlisp and PSL, nothing would have changed. Had anyone really
wanted either of these, they could have been done, technically speaking,
without much effort.  

The VAX solved the hardware issues. The MC68000 and cheap memory
made the solution more realistic.
Few people realize that Macsyma has been run routinely FOR 2 YEARS on numerous
(different) 68000-based workstations at UCB. 
MIT and Symbolics have maintained legal barriers to its distribution.

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 27 Jan 1985  20:06-EST from fateman%ucbdali at Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  A proposal
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA, ohlander@USC-ISI.ARPA, quinquevirate@SU-AI.ARPA,
To:    fateman%ucbdali@位Berkeley (Richard Fateman)位
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083019346.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sun, 27 Jan 1985  20:27 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sun 27 Jan 85 20:27:45-EST


    Is it your intention to forbid a lisp manual to use the CL chapter
    on packages [paying suitable royalties], if the lisp in question
    neglects to adopt the string chapter? How about lexical scoping?  
    Is this DEC's intention too?  I guess I would be happier if the manual
    were put in the public domain, and the imprimateur of the CL committee
    was separate.

I see two issues here.  First, the manual is at present the sole written
form of the Common Lisp standard, and the whole community has an
interest in preventing random mutations in that standard, or confusion
as to what the standard really is.  So I believe that if anyone wants to
use parts of this manual and not other parts, this should only be
allowed if there is a firm agreement that the new version clearly label
itself as not a Common Lisp, but is a distinct dialect that happens to
use a package system identical to that in Common Lisp (or whatever).
That's very important.  Putting the manual in the public domain would
allow the publication of many nearly-identical versions of the manual,
all claiming to be Common Lisp, and some of them "improved" in various
ways by irresponsible or incompetent editors.

The other issue is simply makign sure that the original author and/or
the current copyright holder is appropriately compensated if commercial
use is made of significant parts of the original work.  That can be a
private matter between the parties concerned.

- -- Scott

--
From: RPG  
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Varia
Date: 27 Jan 1985 21:15 EST

Before I get on to serious flaming, there are a few announcements
I'd like to make:

1. I have included on CL-CHARTER all of the people to whom messages
addressed to CL-CHARTER@SAIL,QUINQUEVIRATE@SAIL,SQUIRES@ISI,OHLANDER@ISI,
FATEMAN@BERKELEY go. So from now on you'll simply need to mail to 
CL-CHARTER@SAIL to get all of these guys.

2. I talked to Ron Ohlander on Friday, and he mentioned that DARPA will
probably put up some money for a lawyer in the form of asking a
government lawyer to provide some counsel for us on the legal issues that
have been raised. It sounds like we should get together a list of precisely
defined issues to present to this fellow when his time becomes available.

Now on to the discussion. Fateman asks whether we intend to require that
implementors who choose to implement exactly Common Lisp packages also be
forced to also `include' the string features. Certainly we wouldn't want
to require that the implementors implement them, but we certainly do not
want to require that their documentation document all of Common Lisp to
simply document this one convenience.

I believe an acceptable solution would be for the documentor to state that
the package system is identical to that described in Chapter 11 and to
duplicate, in his own words, what that chapter contains.

What we wish to avoid is the case of the document being in the public
domain with people able to spread near misses or deliberate fakes.
There was a company (a bank) in San Francisco that decided it wanted to
call itself CityBank of San Francisco. Their attorneys (who are Lucid's
attorneys) recommended strongly against it, but the bank insisted. 
The out-of-court settlement cost `CityBank' $5megs.

If we end up with a world where there can be a silver and green book
entitled `Common Lizp: The Language' by Guy L. Steal Jr., defining dynamic
binding on odd days, the `consumer,' aka the programmer, would be justified
in worrying about false advertising. Imagine what it would be like if
every implementation had its own version of Common Lisp a little different
from the others, and this difference was only noticeable in running code and
by a detailed examintation of the manual (which was otherwise identical to
the Digital Press version).

Look at it this way, when I right a set of macros that I expect a group of
programmers to use in a joint program, I don't give them copies of the
code, I give them pointers to it. The same should be true of the manual.

About the organization, I would like to see a separate organization
established. The organization would be be broken into several parts:
a technical review board, a representative, voting body to discuss issues,
and a `constitution.' The constitution would be the first part of the
Common Lisp book, which discusses the overall principles of Common Lisp.
It would also identify a set of features of Common Lisp that must be
held fixed except by unanimous consent of all. I expect this would be
lexical scoping, multiple values, NIL versus (), closures, MacLisp-likeness,
sequences, packages, and arrays.

The technical board would probably start out being the same old people for
a while, with some additions, until there are a number of implementations
in the field. The voting body would be self-selected from the
community, with a sliding scale of dues paid by individuals, companies,
and possibly universities. DARPA and Digital Press would pay dues or otherwise
provide a level of support.

Companies and individuals might be offered compensation towards dues for
civic duty, such as writing validation code or validating the validation
code.

The organization would hold the copyright to CL-85..., so that validation
would give an implementation the right to display this banner. As a person
who now sees how the common man thinks about Lisp, I now understand that
the consumer may not know enough to know he's getting a poor substitute to
Common Lisp. Soon the absence of `validated' as part of the title of
a Common Lisp will be the tip off to a fake.

I believe that the organization should be located near some major university,
perhaps CMU, MIT, USC (ISI), or SU. It should be viewed as an 
academically-oriented organization.

			-rpg-

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12082785776.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]28-Jan-85 08:11:50.OHLANDER>
Cc:  squires@USC-ISI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: A proposal
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  28 Jan 1985 08:11-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 28 Jan 85  05:11:34 PST

Scott, 
	I have not expressed an opinion yet, not because I am not
vitally interested, but because I have been on travel and am now
just catching up with correspondence.  Personnaly, I think the
charter issue is the most vital thing that has to happen if the a
users group is going to materialize.  I am overjoyed that you
have taken some steps to get issues on the table and a draft
going.

I agree with Scott in that we need some form of formal
organization.  In terms of what it costs to get going, we might
be able to gain some idea of what it takes from some of the
original organizers of the AAAI.

We need a formal organization because it is essential to
"institutionalize" Common Lisp in order to make provision for its
continuance after key people disappear from the scene and also in
order to retain some kind of control over its instantiation and
continued refinement.  An informal group can lose interest and
not feel committed in the long run to the health of Common Lisp.
Organizations outlive its individual members, have more stature,
and have a stronger commitment to its objectives.

The veto issue is a key one.  On the one hand, we have all seen
vendors who are reluctant to make changes to a language and only
issue new releases under the strongest pressure.  However, as
Scott points out the vendors will have a vested interest and tend
to act as counterbalance to academics who might want to run a
little wild.  I believe the essential problem is to come up with
a mechanism that permits a balance of viewpoints to prevail.  I
think I lean towards a 2/3 vote to veto recommendations of the
technical community.

Ron

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12082936705.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]28-Jan-85 08:23:21.OHLANDER>
Cc:  squires@USC-ISI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: A proposal
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  28 Jan 1985 08:23-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 28 Jan 85  07:38:59 PST

I gorgot to mention that I have talked to Osbourne at Digital
Press and Fuller at Dec.  I believe that they would be willing to
stipulate that the Common Lisp Users group would own all reights
to the Common Lisp specification.  Furthermore, they have both
said that they look upon their contribution to the establishment
of Common Lisp as a public service and would be willing to
contibute some share of profits to the users group.  I think we
have to get some sort of agreement in writing and am going to see
if I can get government lawyers involved.

I should also point out that Digital Press's claim to a
copywright is questionable.  What do they have a copyright for?
There were a number of organizations and individuals that
contributed to the overall effort.  I think they may have a valid
claim to the manual, as written, but how can they have a clear
claim for the specification.  to complicate the problem, how do
you diambiguate the two?

I believe that we can reach a reasonable written agreement after
we (or in conjunction with) getting a users group established.
By the way, this is another reason for formal status of the users
group.  We have to get a written agreement because players will
change over the years.

Ron

--
From:  marick@GSWD-VMS
Cc:  marick
To:  cl-charter@su-ai
Subject:  Re:  A proposal
Date:  Mon, 28 Jan 85 11:15:56 CST
Received:  from GSWD-VMS.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 28 Jan 85  09:15:03 PST

I read my mail daily, but I don't have authority to make policy for Gould,
either explicitly or implicitly.  It takes more than a couple of days to
get such things decided, anyway.

However,

1.  I'm sure we want to see some reasonable standards organization.

2.  It appears we could swing a $10,000 membership fee.

3.  The development people, at least, are a little leery of making
    a corporate veto too easy.  We're worried that an easy veto
    would lead to a specification that cannot be extended to cover,
    for example, object-oriented programming.

				Brian Marick
				Gould

--
From:  "Daniel L. Weinreb" <DLW@SCRC-STONY-BROOK.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <850128162856.5.DLW@CHICOPEE.SCRC.Symbolics.COM>
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12082785776.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA, cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Subject:  A proposal
Date:  Mon, 28 Jan 85 16:28 EST
Received:  from SCRC-CHICOPEE by SCRC-STONY-BROOK via CHAOS with CHAOS-MAIL id 167550; Mon 28-Jan-85 16:30:06-EST

I've been following all the mail.  Your proposal, in broad outline,
looks good to me.  I consider myself too inexperienced with
organizations of this kind to have any strong opinions about the
details, such as the nature and composition of comittees, voting
by-laws, and so forth; what you have proposed certainly looks reasonable
to me, for what that's worth.  I am adequately satisfied by your
responses to the objections that have been raised.

I would guess that the next steps would be to run this by some people
who you feel have some expertise, or at least experience, with such
organizations, and see whether they suggest changes.  Also, it's
probably time to find out the details of legal help that DARPA might
supply, and discuss this all with the lawyer(s).

Based on what I know so far, I think it's quite likely that Symbolics
will be happy to participate in this organization.  The corporate dues
seem reasonable to me.  I haven't consulted my management or the
Symbolics corporate counsel yet (it seems too early for that), so I
can't speak unequivocally on behalf of the company, but I don't forsee
any problems.

Thank you very much for putting so much time and effort into this!

--
From:  brown@DEC-HUDSON
Cc:  Brown@dec-hudson
To:  cl-charter@su-ai
Subject:  Charter
Date:  Mon, 28 Jan 85 16:33:43 EST
Received:  from DEC-HUDSON.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 28 Jan 85  13:32:49 PST

For those who don't know me, I am Gary Brown and manage the Lisp development
group at DEC.  In that capacity, I suppose I have some; but certainly
not complete; responsibilities associated with Digital's position on
the content and evolution of the Common Lisp language.  However, I have no
authority to speak about (and frankly no first hand knowledge of) Digital
Press's position on the manual.  So, whatever I say with respect
to the DEC Press/copyright issue is my personal opinion.

Basically, I think that DEC Press would be willing to do whatever was
requested of them with respect to the manual.  I believe that their
honest desire is to be thought of as a respected technical publishing company
and that they strenuously avoid association with any marketing strategies
of the corporation.  I believe that the fact that they hold the copyright
to the manual is simply standard practice in the publishing industry.
It gives them some amount of protection for their investment and also gives
the author some amount of protection.  I imagine that DEC Press would
rather give up all rights to the manual than acquire a bad reputation
with this group (which surely represents lots of future authors).

In my opinion, the fact that the manual is only available in a hardcopy,
implementation independent form is fine.   We should perhaps allow
random excerpts for the purpose of creating doc strings and allow
the entire volume to be printed with other covers and formats so vendors
could create consistent packaging for their entire doc sets.  I don't
think we are doing anyone (particularly users) any favors by:
 1) Allowing the whole thing (or even major parts) to be distributed
    in an on-line form.  The manual is simply not appropriately
    organized for this purpose.
 2) Allowing sections or chapters to be included in other works.  At
    a minimum, someone would need to administer this process and
    probably proofread the final product.  I imagine it is not worth it.

We distribute the manual with another volume which describes how we differ
from it.  This is not perfect, but it works out.  However, there are
some risks with this approach:
 1) What happens if the publisher goes out of business or decides
    not to continue printing the book?  I don't worry about this
    very much but the Common Lisp community needs to insure that
    should this happen, the right to republish the book immediately
    is clearly available.
 2) What happens if a vendor runs out of copies of the manual at the
    same time that the publisher runs out of copies?  This is simply
    a matter of inventory control and in my opinion, primarily the
    responsibility of the vendor.  I suppose that we might want
    to insure the publisher will rapidly reprint the book when necessary.
 3) What happens when the community wants to print a new version of
    the manual including new features which a particular implementation
    does not support?  In the second manual, we point out which parts
    of the language we don't implement but this isn't reasonable if
    there is a long list or if the differences are widely spread
    throughout the manual.   I am sure that vendors who ship the manual
    with their doc sets, will want assurance that major changes to
    the manual are announced well in advance of the publication of a
    new version of the manual.

An interesting issue is what becomes of the royalties from the publication
of the book if more a group effort than the result of Guy's labor.  I think
this is a topic for private discussion between Guy and whatever organization
gets set up.

As for Scott's charter proposals, I prefer plan 1 - it sounds like the most
fun.  My main concern is that we not underestimate the amount of work that
will be involved in the administration of the Association, at least initially.
I would not be surprised if we need at least  one full time, non-clerical
employee.  So, perhaps we should consider an organization where the president
of the association is a salaried employee and reports to the board of directors
(the executive committee).  The Association would either lease its own 
equipment (we ought to be able to get a good deal from someone) or rent 
time depending on what makes the most sense.  [I suspect that there are
a host of business decisions which need to be considered - we should probably
develop a "model" of the association's first few years and see what kind
of time and money investment we are talking about.  If that seems reasonable,
I'll try to pull something together.]

Here are other random comments on the Scott's proposal:
 2.1  I assume that the "official language definition" that the association
      maintains is Guy's manual.  Can we assume that Guy is willing to
      give what rights he has to the manual to the association?

 2.3  Validation of implementations is one of the most visible and valuable
      functions the Association can perform.  The validation committee
      has been silent recently but I think it is time for some serious
      recommendations from them.  If we cannot acquire an initial set
      of validation programs for free from the current community, we need to
      think about subcontracting its creation or having the association
      create one.

 2.5  Association members which do not have access to electronic mail
      are going to be a big headache.   It is easy enough to bundle up
      a month's worth of communications and U.S.Mail them to everyone,
      but we also need to distribute the mail which comes from them
      with their comments.  Perhaps clever things can now be done
      with optical character readers but it seems unlikely.  Is there
      anyway we can require electronic access for all voting members?
      Perhaps the answer is some kind of "bulletin board" system where
      a member dials into the Association's data base.

 3.0  The basic membership scheme relies on the corporate members
      to financially support the Association.  Although I don't
      think that large corporations, such as DEC, would balk at 
      $10,000 per year, are there enough of these to get us going
      and is this a sufficiently secure financial foundation?
      Perhaps what we want to do, is decrease the corporate dues to, say,
      $2,000 in hopes of gaining a wider base.  For example, software
      houses producing code in Common Lisp, have less at stake than
      system vendors and may not feel membership is worth $10K.
      We could make up the difference by charging a substantial fee
      for validation/use of the "Validated Common Lisp" trademark.
      This seems fairer, since access to the validation suite and
      the validation process has a tangible value to a vendor.

 3.1  The individual membership fees seem about right.  Perhaps
      individual members should get a secret decoder ring also.

 3.2  I am certain that DEC would join up for $10,000 and probably
      somewhat more.

      If we accept ARPA seed money, will there (are there already)
      export limitations on what the Association "produces"?

      Another benefit we might want to consider for corporate members
      is the right to redistribute (not for profit) the "yellow pages".
      (If the vendors ship it with their product, it probably saves the
      Association money).

 5.0  The technical decision process starts with an issue being raised
      by the technical committee.  I think that many issues will
      be initiated by the general membership.  In particular, implementors
      will have lots of clarification requests.  Do we commit to answer
      this type of question?  Can this be another benefit of corporate
      membership?

      Even if we require that everyone have electronic access to the
      communications, fourteen days is perhaps insufficient time for the
      technical committee to make a decision and surely insufficient
      time for the corporate members to challenge a decision (I have been
      told that many people take two week vacations).  I think twenty-eight
      days is more like it.

      There seems to be a general objection to the power given to the
      corporate members in Scott's proposal.  I suppose I am biased,
      but I really don't see that much danger.  I think that corporations
      will, within reason, be more concerned about the timing of changes
      than they are with their content.   We ought to address the rules
      on manual/validation suite update.  I suggest something like:

         * Plans to publish new editions of the manual will be announced
           at least three months prior to the date of publication.
           An accurate list of changes will be distributed free to corporate
           members and for some nominal fee to other members (or maybe
           free to everyone, except that this might involve hard copy.)

         * Changes and extensions will not be published in the manual
           or required by the validation suite for at least six months
           after their approval.

         * Each new version of the validation suite will be made available
           to corporate members for six months prior to it becoming an
           official suite.  During this period, the standard (TBS) validation
           objection handling mechanism will be available to correct
           errors in the suite.
           
         * Clarifications become part of the language definition 
           immediately (but we need a mechanism to allow something initailly
           declared to be a clarification to have its rating changed
           to extension).

-Gary

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Varia    
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    Dick Gabriel <RPG@SU-AI.ARPA>
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083304381.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Mon, 28 Jan 1985  22:33 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Mon 28 Jan 85 22:33:26-EST


I have finally received a bunch of responses to the charter proposal.
Thanks!  I'll respond to these individually.  Gabriel is first.

I don't think we have too much disagreement on the manual.  I would
allow some use of passages from the manual under carefully controlled
conditions; RPG would apparently make people reference or paraphrase the
relevant passages and not use them verbatim.  We're both after the same
kind of control over small mutations, whether accidental or deliberate.
The tactics can be worked out later.

Since RPG did not relate his comments on the organization to my
proposal, and did not present a detailed proposal of his own, it's hard
to know for sure where we agree and disagree.  What I will do here is to
try to list those disagreements that I can spot in looking over his
message, and then respond to each.  Dick, if I miss anything you
consider important, let me know.

1. RPG wants a constitution, written and approved in advance, that would
forbid any changes in certain parts of the language (lexical scoping,
multiple values, etc.) except by unanimous consent.

I consider this totally unworkable.  If RPG thinks that such a
constitution (with the associated interpreter) can be made workable, I'd
like to see the details.  How are we going to define "Maclisp-likeness",
and who is going to rule on whether a proposed change alters this?  I
don't really think that this is any safer than the checks and balances
in the system I proposed, except that it would make it easier for
disgruntled companies to sue the organization, which is certainly not
what we want.

And do we really want to rule out any change in packages or arrays?  I
don't.  Stability is one thing; fossilization is quite another.  I think
that proposed system with a technical committee and a veto by the
companies gives us about as much stability as we want.  If the initial
technical committe turns out to be mostly "the same old people" (sigh!),
then all of the features you listed are safe for two years, and after
that nobody will want to change them.

2. RPG speaks of a "sliding scale" of dues paid by individuals, companies,
and maybe universities, with DARPA and Digital Press possibly being
special cases.  Also he speaks of giving companies credit against their
dues for various services performed for the organization.

Do you have a specific proposal?  After thinking a bit about how the
scale might slide, I decided that all the companies ought to pay the
same amount.  That way nobody feels discriminated against, and
everything stays as simple as possible.  As soon as you make the scheme
more complex, everyone starts maneuvering for the best deal and the hard
feelings begin.  I really don't think that the $10K would be an
excessive burden for any of the major companies, even small-ish ones
like Lucid.  If some 2-person software house can't afford $10K, they can
just join up as individual members until they crack the Fortune 500.

I also think that it is a mistake to accept services in lieu of dues.
Again, this leads to all sorts of unpleasantness about why the
organization would accept certain machines or services and would not
accept others on the same terms.  It is much simpler, I think, to charge
dues at a fixed rate and then to contract for the services the
organization needs.  If the services happen to be bought from members of
the association, so be it.

3. RPG suggests that the organizaiton should be viewed as "academically
oriented".  I'm not sure what that means, in practice.  I certainly
agree that it should be set up on or very near to one of the
universities that have played a role in this process, if only because
that makes it easier to obtain ARPANET access.

- -- Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 28 Jan 1985  08:11-EST from OHLANDER at USC-ISI.ARPA
Subject:  A proposal
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083307643.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Mon, 28 Jan 1985  22:51 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Mon 28 Jan 85 22:51:22-EST


Well, that's two people arguing explicitly for requiring a 2/3 vote of
corporate members to veto the technical committee's decisions, and a
couple of others who feel that vetos shouldn't be "too easy".  I'm happy
to go with 2/3 instead of a simple majority (assuming that we go with
this framework at all).  As I said earlier, I don't think this makes a lot of
difference, though I believe that the existence of some sort of veto is
a useful mechanism.

If I hear no dissenting voices, I will modify the proposal to require a
2/3 vote of corporate members for a veto.

- -- Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Message from Gary Brown
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083324276.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 29 Jan 1985  00:22 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Tue 29 Jan 85 00:22:45-EST


Gary,

Thanks for your insights into the workings of Digital Press.  It is in
accord with everything else I've heard.  I think that as a working
assumption we should assume that those folks are going to be totally
reasonable unless they give us some reason to believe otherwise.  So far
their only sin has been that they have taken a very long time to come to
any agreement with Data General, and that seems mostly due to a desire
on their part to clear everything with all interested parties at each
step, since precendents are being set.

I think that it is important to make the manual available in online
form.  Granted, the format is not optimal for online use, but it would
still be nice to be able to reference the definitive text on my machine,
perhaps with some sort of online index that will zap me to the right
page.

I think that we probably will need a good fraction of someone's time to
keep this all running smoothly, and agree that that person should be
paid by the association for this work.  Probably it is not the president
of the association who does this stuff (and is on salary) but rather
some sort of technically competent administrative assistant.  Whether
the organization employs this person directly or whether it contracts
with someone to provide such services is an issue we can face later on,
I think.  Contracting with someone would give the organization more
flexibility, I think, since we don't know in advance whether we will
need .4 people or 1.1 people.  Similarly, it probably makes sense
to buy time on some Arpanet-connected time-sharing machine (so that
members can access files and libraries), rather than having the
association buy its own equipment.

I would be happy for you to work out some alternative plans for how the
business end of this would run.  Probably this should wait until (a) we
have settled on a charter, in rough outline, at least, and (b) we have a
list of porspective members whom we can poll about how they would use
the services of the association.

     2.1  I assume that the "official language definition" that the association
          maintains is Guy's manual.  Can we assume that Guy is willing to
          give what rights he has to the manual to the association?

The "official definition" at any time would consist of the most recent
authorized version of the manual plus a document listing any amendments
that have been adopted since the last manual came out.  I think that we
can assume that Guy will agree to any reasonable proposal for producing
updated versions of the manual, conforming to the association's
decisions on technical issues.

     2.3  Validation of implementations is one of the most visible and valuable
          functions the Association can perform.  The validation committee
          has been silent recently but I think it is time for some serious
          recommendations from them.  If we cannot acquire an initial set
          of validation programs for free from the current community, we need to
          think about subcontracting its creation or having the association
          create one.

I'm not worried about this.  We don't need recommendations, just some
action.  Someday soon, if nobody beats me to it, I will ask everyone to
send me all the validation code that they're willing to make public and
will put it all in a public place on CMUC.  Then we'll see what's
missing, divide it into little chunks, ask for volunteers for those
chunks, and be done in no time.  Well...then there's the problem of
resolving any disputes, but that's the fun part.

     2.5  Association members which do not have access to electronic mail
          are going to be a big headache.   It is easy enough to bundle up
          a month's worth of communications and U.S.Mail them to everyone,
          but we also need to distribute the mail which comes from them
          with their comments...

Hmmm...well, it's tempting to say that people out in paper land don't
get to participate, but some of them may be in Japan or someplace.  I
guess one of the tasks of the office person will be to type hardcopy
letters into some machine and mail them out electronically to the rest
of the membership.

     3.0  The basic membership scheme relies on the corporate members
          to financially support the Association.  Although I don't
          think that large corporations, such as DEC, would balk at 
          $10,000 per year, are there enough of these to get us going
          and is this a sufficiently secure financial foundation?
          Perhaps what we want to do, is decrease the corporate dues to, say,
          $2,000 in hopes of gaining a wider base...

My guess is that we'll get 30 corporate members at $10K, and can count
on getting 10.  I don't think we'd get many more members at $2K.  I just
don't think that $10K is a big enough sum to worry any reasonably big
company that is in the Common Lisp game in any way.  I would prefer to
go with nice, simple, uniform dues rather than trying to support the
organization through validation fees, but I could probably be talked out
of this.

     3.1  The individual membership fees seem about right.  Perhaps
          individual members should get a secret decoder ring also.

Or a micro-Vax?

          If we accept ARPA seed money, will there (are there already)
          export limitations on what the Association "produces"?

It is important that we try to avoid any export restrictions, especially
if we accept foreign corporate members (and I think we should).  I don't
think that DARPA money will affect this one way or the other.  The
problem, if any, is with other parts of DOD, with the Department of
Commerce, and with Congress.

          Another benefit we might want to consider for corporate members
          is the right to redistribute (not for profit) the "yellow pages".
          (If the vendors ship it with their product, it probably saves the
          Association money).

I would assume that even individual members get this.  It would be
easier to put most of this stuff in the public domain than to try to
control who can use it for what.  (I think.)

     5.0  The technical decision process starts with an issue being raised
          by the technical committee.  I think that many issues will
          be initiated by the general membership.  In particular, implementors
          will have lots of clarification requests.  Do we commit to answer
          this type of question?  Can this be another benefit of corporate
          membership?

We commit to doing the best we can to provide timely answers.  I would
be uneasy with any guarantees, since the members of the technical
committee are presumably volunteers with real jobs on the side.  I would
certainly hope that the technical committee could do a bit better than
the quiquevirate has done in the recent past.  Having someone to do the
bookkeeping on this would help some.

          Even if we require that everyone have electronic access to the
          communications, fourteen days is perhaps insufficient time for the
          technical committee to make a decision and surely insufficient
          time for the corporate members to challenge a decision (I have been
          told that many people take two week vacations).  I think twenty-eight
          days is more like it.

OK.

          There seems to be a general objection to the power given to the
          corporate members in Scott's proposal.  I suppose I am biased,
          but I really don't see that much danger.  I think that corporations
          will, within reason, be more concerned about the timing of changes
          than they are with their content.   We ought to address the rules
          on manual/validation suite update.  I suggest something like:

             * Plans to publish new editions of the manual will be announced
               at least three months prior to the date of publication.
               An accurate list of changes will be distributed free to corporate
               members and for some nominal fee to other members (or maybe
               free to everyone, except that this might involve hard copy.)

             * Changes and extensions will not be published in the manual
               or required by the validation suite for at least six months
               after their approval.

             * Each new version of the validation suite will be made available
               to corporate members for six months prior to it becoming an
               official suite.  During this period, the standard (TBS) validation
               objection handling mechanism will be available to correct
               errors in the suite.
               
             * Clarifications become part of the language definition 
               immediately (but we need a mechanism to allow something initailly
               declared to be a clarification to have its rating changed
               to extension).

Sounds pretty good to me.  Does anyone have any problems with this?

- -- Scott

--
From:  Steve <Ford%ti-csl.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Received:  from csl60 by ti-csl; Tue, 29 Jan 85 18:31 CST
cc:  FORD%ti-csl.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa
To:  cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Subject:  Re:  A proposal
Date:  29 Jan 1985 1817-CST

I support Scott's proposal and am in the process of discussing the subject
with other implementers, users and managers at TI.  I don't anticipate any
problems.  There has been some concern here that the $10K figure was plucked
from the air, which, I guess, it was.  But there should be no problem with the
amount if people are convinced that they receive their fair share of value,
which I think they will.  Things can always be fine-tuned once we get going
and see what our needs really are.  An excellent first cut.

The manual is not a concern here; TI is doing its own with, I think, the
cooperation of Digital Press.

A 2/3 majority sounds reasonable for corporate veto, but I doubt that it would
ever be used.

No use trading validation suites for membership, most companies will be
donating theirs, as is TI.  Its in their own best interest.

I'll forward the "official" TI position whenever its available.

Steve Ford 
Computer Science Laboratory
Texas Instruments
- -------

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 29 Jan 1985  19:17-EST from Steve <Ford%ti-csl.csnet at csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:  A proposal
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    Steve <Ford%ti-csl.csnet@CSNET-RELAY.ARPA>
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083699419.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Wed, 30 Jan 1985  10:43 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Wed 30 Jan 85 10:43:27-EST


Steve,

Thanks for your support on this.

The $10K figure was indeed an arbitrary choice.  The problem is that
it's very hard to tell how much the administrative services
are going to cost until we get down to negotiating these services with
various possible providers.  And it's even harder to tell in advance how
many companies will join up.  It seemed foolish to set the dues too low
and then have to scrape and sweat for money to keep the organization
afloat.  I initially thought about proposing $20K, just to stay well on
the safe side, but when I added things up that seemed too conservative,
and for some companies $20K requires many more levels of approval than
$10K -- there's a magic threshold in there somewhere.

I looked around and counted about 30 companies that I thought would
probably join up, and about 10 that I felt certain of -- companies that
have already spent much, much more than $10K in producing Common Lisp
implementations or products that depend critically on Common Lisp for
portability.  So that gives us a worst-case floor of $100K on the
organization's income, and I thought that was enough to pay for the
services of one office person, computer time purchased from a major
university, and a moderate level of lawyer's fees.

If we discover that we have to pay some large amount for some kind of
liability insurance, or if the lawyers' fees to get this started exceed
the available seed money, and if the membership is only 10 companies,
then we may have to increase the dues or ask for an additional one-time
contribution.  More likely, I think, we will end up with more than
enough corporate members, and will have a surplus.  Once a comfortable
reserve has built up, we would either decrease the dues to the
break-even point, or spend the extra money on providing additional
services to the Common Lisp community.  This would be decided by the
executive committee, but we would certainly follow the wishes of the
corporate members in making such decisions.

- -- Scott

--
From:      Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:   Proposal response.
To:        cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Date:      Wed, 30 Jan 85 11:17 EST
Received:  from umass-cs by csnet-relay.csnet id ah05629; 31 Jan 85 1:05 EST




Scott,

Thanks for the proposal. My feeling is to go with number 1.

The section 2.4 discussing funding of the production of new materials
bothers me a bit. I think it is fine to produce such materials as long
as they are not of a research nature. I don't want this thing to be a
funding agency.

One other job of the organization is  make it known who we are and
possible provide joint advertising for Common Lisp in the CACM.
(or the Wall Street Journal?)

I suspect we should keep the Executive branch at 5 and the technical at
7. The low number is to make sure we have active members. It is
easier to increase than decrease down the road somewhere.

As far as who has final say the corporation or the technical committee, 
I would go with the more conservative corporation.  We are looking for
compatiblity as the primary goal. I think coporate final control will never
be used but will temper radical swings.

- --Rick

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 30 Jan 1985  11:17-EST from Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet at csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:  Proposal response.
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@CSNET-RELAY.ARPA>
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12083961960.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Thu, 31 Jan 1985  10:45 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Thu 31 Jan 85 10:45:38-EST


Rick,

What I had in mind with the stuff in section 2.4 was not to do research,
but rather to sponsor the creation of some little conveniences that
ought to be in the public domain.  Some things that come to mind are
various number-crunching libraries that would be nice to have available,
portable code for a Loop macro or infix syntax, code-analysis tools,
some sort of very simple natural-language parser, translation aids
to/from Franz, PSL, or Interlisp, and maybe even a game or two.
Projects that are too implementation-specific would not be appropriate.
It probably WOULD be appropriate to fund the conversion of large systems
from other languages into Common Lisp if the result can be either
public-domain or would be readily and cheaply available so that lots of
us benefit from the translation having been done.  None of this would be
undertaken unless the organization finds itself with a surplus and
decides to fund such things rather than reducing the dues.

I agree that some small amount of publicity will be needed, including
perhaps some paid ads.  It will be essential to publicize the "Validated
Common Lisp" trademark, and to let people not on the grapevine know that
there is an organizaiton they can join. 

- -- Scott

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Where we stand
Cc:    fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12087705084.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Thu, 14 Feb 1985  17:27 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Thu 14 Feb 85 17:27:15-EST


Comment on my original charter proposal seems to have simmered down.
On the substance of the proposal, there have been two suggestions, both
of which I now favor:

1. Require a 2/3 majority of corporate members to veto a decision by the
executive committee, not just a simple majority.

2. Say something specific in the charter about making changes and new
test suites available to the community well before such changes become
official.

I would say that about half of the people I've heard from favor the
proposal, more or less, and feel that their companies would also favor
it and probably would join up.  The other half have expressed some
fundamental reservations with the whole idea.  Some think that we can
get by without such a big bureacratic organization.  Others have said
that their companies would be more inclined to pay someone for specific
services (validation, library tapes, etc.) than to pay dues to some
organization from which they might or might not derive any real benefit.
For some of these companies, it is evidently much easier to authorize
$20K to validate a given product than to authorize $10K to support an
organization that does free validation for members.  Weird, but true.

One other thing has been on my mind of late.  The more I talk to people
who have helped to found organizations like this in the past, the more I
believe that it won't happen unless someone is willing to jump in and
give it a year, full-time.  Just because it's a good idea that everyone
supports doesn't mean that an organization can get rolling without a
serious effort on someone's part.  For the record, I am not willing to
be that person, and I don't see anyone around who is any more inclined
to do this than I am.  AAAI went out and hired some professionals to do
this stuff, be even so it took a *LOT* of work on the part of some of
the founders to get the turkey airborne.

Given that, I've started to play around with another option: having no
central organization at all.  Under this model, similar to the Ada model
in some ways, DOD would have a much larger role in promoting the
standardization/validation effort and perhaps supporting certain other
services for the next couple of years.  The disadvantage is that the
checks and balances are gone and we all have to trust whatever part of
DOD it is to keep the "approved" language reasonably stable.  The
advantage is that we don't waste valuable time and energy trying to
launch this big clanking bureacracy, whose existence will be much less
important a couple of years from now -- just about the time it is
finally running smoothly.

Once I get my thoughts collected on this, I'll send something out to
this list and then we can see which of the two models we think is most
likely to fly.

- -- Scott

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12087705084.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]15-Feb-85 08:09:12.OHLANDER>
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: Where we stand
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  15 Feb 1985 08:09-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 15 Feb 85  05:08:31 PST

Scott, 
	You are absolutely right when you say it will require some
substantial effort to make this whole thing happen.  A number of
people have to be committed to it.  I don't think that we need a
person to give a full year of his time; a group of people can
share the responsibility, although someone will have to be in
charge.  To support this position, I'll just point to your own
example, i.e., the AAAI.  This is why I have pointed out that it
might be beneficial to do this under their aegis.  They are
already a bureaucracy in place and have many of the mechanisms to
make it happen.  The IEEE may be even a better option since they
already have standards committees.

As far as the Ada model is concerned, forget it.  It is not that
the government is opposed to such an idea for Common Lisp, but
rather that the manpower doesn't exist to do it.  To support Ada,
the Ada Joint Projects Office was established.  There is no
counterpart for Lisp.  However, if all else fails, DARPA might be
able to take it on by first establishing Common Lisp as a DoD
standard and then paying someone to maintain it for a while.  We
might use ISI to do this.  If this route was taken, the whole
thing would still be dependent upon the continuing support of
people like yourself to help review proposed changes, etc.  I
would also point out that this is not something that DARPA likes
to do, but would rather have the community support.  However, I
think that Common Lisp is important enough that we would step in
to prevent the whole effort from becoming stillborn.  If that happens,
we would also look for some way to get some other organization,
e.g., IEEE, to eventually take over the role of support.

Ron

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Minimalist model
Cc:    fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12088832826.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 19 Feb 1985  00:42 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Tue 19 Feb 85 00:42:07-EST


My earlier proposal described one scheme for an organization that would
help to foster and promote Common Lisp.  Some advantages of that scheme:

1. It provides a broad range of services to the community, all from a
single source.

2. These services are paid for by the companies that stand to benefit
directly from the standardization of Common Lisp.

3. There is a clear legal entity with authority over the Common Lisp
definition, with mechanisms for evolution of the language.

4. Through a system of checks and balances, we have some degree of
assurance that the language definition will not evolve in ways that most
of the current Common Lisp community would find unacceptable.

On the other hand, there are some serious problems:

1. There is a lot of overhead cost in setting up such an organization: a
lot of someone's time, and a lot of money for legal fees and
administrative costs.  It would be much better if these resources went
into projects that are of real value to the Common Lisp community.

2. Some companies don't like this scheme.  In some companies, the
lawyers might object, in others the $10K dues would be too much, and in
others there is an aversion to spending money on things whose benefits
are not easily quatifiable.

3. Despite our best efforts, the definition process might be hijacked by
groups whose interests do not coincide with those of the people
currently involved.

4. Some of the services are needed right away, and will be much less
important as time goes on.  The organization, on the other hand, will
probably not be functioning smoothly for six months or a year.

So, for the sake of comparison, let's see how some of the things that
need to be done might get done if there were no separate organization.

Some services, essential for the health of Common Lisp, don't require
any real authority, but do require a non-trivial level of clerical and
low-grade technical support.  At present, these things either are not
getting done, or are being done in an inadequate way as bootleg projects
without any real funding.  Among these services are the following:

* Writing (or collecting), maintaining, and distributing a validation
  suite.

* Collecting, organizing, and distributing the yellow pages (libraries
  of public-domain code), with associated documentation.

* Distributing and polishing the CMU Common Lisp code, and any other
  public-domain code that might be of value to implementation efforts.

* Writing and distributing new pieces of code that are needed as new
  standards are adopted (e.g. code for some sort of iteration macro).

* Where it says "distributing", that means making and shipping tapes or
  moving the files by network, depending on who the recipient is.  It
  also means answering a lot of questions on the phone about what is
  available and how it all fits together.

A Common Lisp organization could do all of those things, but that's not
the only way.  DARPA could give some university group (or other neutral
organization) a contract to do this stuff, for the next couple of years
at least.  After that, maybe the service wouldn't be needed or maybe
industry could take over.  To do this stuff right would require one
full-time administrative assistant who is not afraid of machines and one
full-time programmer (or several part-timers) who are funded explicitly
to do this work, plus a small slice of some high-level technical person
as PI.  CMU has been doing some of this stuff informally, but without
the level of support described above.  (The clerical person in this case
is usually me, and I like to think that I have better things to do.)
Stanford has also done some of this.

DARPA may or may not think that this is a good investment.  It may in
the end cost less to fund these services directly (for awhile) than to
pay a lot of lawyers to help set up an organization that would get
industry to pay for the services.

The other big set of issues is who decides what the "official" Common
Lisp is, who determines whether a given implementation meets these
standards, and how do we keep implmentations from claiming to be a
Common Lisp when they do not meet these standards.

Well, if DOD wants to require Common Lisp as the vehicle in certain
contracts, perhaps they should be the ones to define what they mean by
"Common Lisp".  Other companies would very likely follow DOD's lead, as
long as it is reasonable.  Perhaps this is naive, but I don't see why
this should take a lot of staff support within DOD.  Consider the
following model:

1. DOD obtains the right to reprint the existing language specification,
to make modifications to it, and to authorize others to print it.
Either they obtain these rights from Digital Press, or they get someone
to come up with an independent language spec.  (It doesn't have to be as
readable as the current book, which is both spec and programmer's
manual.)  There is no reason that Digital Press cannot continue to
produce the book, but DOD needs to have some language spec that they can
alter unilaterally, without getting anyone's permission, and they need
the right to disseminate the result.  This version, and not the book,
becomes the official Common Lisp spec as far as DOD and their
contractors are concerned.

2. An outside panel of experts is set up to consider questions, proposed
extensions, and so on, in consultation with people in the companies and
the user community.  This group closely parallels the technical
committee proposed earlier (and the ad hoc group that has been doing
this so far), except that they are chosen by someone in DOD and they
technically just recommend changes and clarifications.  Such
recommendations would normally be "rubber stamped" by the DOD people
with formal responsibility, unless there is a lot of objection from some
quarter; in the rare case that the community splits badly on some
critical issue, a more formal review process might have to be set up.
It would be essential to set things up so that the members of the
advisory committee are protected from lawsuits.  I hope that this can be
done without setting up a huge government bureaucracy to carefully
review and get comments on every decision, but maybe that hope is naive.

3. An up-to-date language spec is always available from DOD.  Whoever is
under contract to do the validation suites would be required to track
any officially-adopted changes.

4. Given a validation suite officially blessed by the U.S. government,
it should be easy to get some organization to go around and do official
validations using that suite.  The companies would pay for this service.
This group would keep a list of who is validated, for which year's
test suite, and to what level of compliance.  This should be a totally
mindless operation -- no discretionary powers -- so it shouldn't be hard
to set up.

5. DOD gets a trademark for "Official GI Joe Common Lisp" or whatever,
and allows companies to use this if and only if they are properly
validated.  This is maybe not too important, since if the validation
suites are generally available, everyone will know which implementations
work and which ones don't, and it is fraud if you claim in advertising
that you can run some particular validation program when you really
can't.

It looks to me like this whole thing could be done with very little
staff support inside DOD.  In fact, a large staff working on this would
just cause a lot of trouble, unless they were all very good -- they'd
want to review all of the decisions themselves, etc.  This would work
best if the DOD people, while retaining the formal authority, are too
busy to exercise it.  Maybe the office that controls the Ada trademark
and validation could handle this as well, as long as they don't develop
an interest in making Common Lisp resemble Ada.

This model has none of the formal checks and balances that the separate
organization would have.  In principle, whoever runs this at DOD could
suddenly decide that "Official GI Joe Common Lisp" is really Ada or
Basic or Interlisp.  That gives them a lot of power, but it's hard to
see any motivation for them to use it in ways that would go against the
wishes of the community.  If they did anything too bizarre, the
companies could decide to go their own way on this and DOD would almost
certainly have to follow.  I'm not saying there's no way this could go
wrong, but I don't see any way in which it is LIKELY to go wrong.

Well, that's the "minimalist" model.  Let me know how you think it
stacks up against the "Common Lisp Association" model.  The minimalist
model depends critically on DARPA's approval, since their role in it is
pivotal; the CLA model depends on being able to find someone who can
put in the time to get the organization set up and running.

Any other ideas?

- -- Scott

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12088832826.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]20-Feb-85 12:35:09.OHLANDER>
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: Minimalist model
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  20 Feb 1985 12:35-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 20 Feb 85  09:34:33 PST

Scott et. al.,
	Steve and I have formed the conjecture that it will be hard to
get a Common Lisp User's group going in any short amount of time.
We have also come to believe that getting AAAI or IEEE to sponsor
a standard will take too long.  Therefore, to provide some
initial standing for Common Lisp, we plan to go through the process
of setting it up as an official DoD language.  We also plan to 
trademark the language, probably using the name "Common Lisp 84."
If there are any objections to this course of action, let us know
right away.  We are also open to using some other name.

ROn

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 20 Feb 1985  12:35-EST from OHLANDER at USC-ISI.ARPA
Subject:  Minimalist model
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12089273010.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Wed, 20 Feb 1985  17:00 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Wed 20 Feb 85 17:00:08-EST


I think that those two steps would be good ones, though they are kind of
meaningless unless coupled with other steps, such as the existence of a
DOD-approved validation suite.  I been assuming that it is too late to
trademark "Common Lisp 84", but if you can do it, that would be a useful
step.  Then you would have control over people using this exact name,
but people with more generic or un-validated products could still call
them "Common Lisp".  If "Common Lisp 84" is deemed to be unavailable,
then "DOD Common Lisp" or "DOD Approved Common Lisp" might fly for the
version on the DOD approved languages list.

- -- Scott

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12089273010.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]21-Feb-85 07:43:33.OHLANDER>
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: Minimalist model
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  21 Feb 1985 07:43-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 21 Feb 85  04:42:54 PST

Scott,
	I agree that those "other things" have to be done.
I am not so concerned about the validation suite.  The thing that really 
concerns me is to how to keep the language viable.  This will require the 
volunteer work of interested users, e.g., to extend the specification for 
new features.

Ron

--
From:  brown@DEC-HUDSON
Cc:  cl-charter@su-ai
To:  ohlander@usc-isi
Subject:  DoD language
Date:  Thu, 21 Feb 85 08:50:36 EST
Received:  from DEC-HUDSON.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 21 Feb 85  05:47:54 PST

Ron,
What does it mean to be an "official DoD" language?  Does this
mean we are accepting and implementing Scott's second model?
-Gary

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  The message of Thu, 21 Feb 85 08:50:35 EST from brown@DEC-HUDSON
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]21-Feb-85 09:46:52.OHLANDER>
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  brown@DEC-HUDSON.ARPA
Subject:  Re: DoD language
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  21 Feb 1985 09:46-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 21 Feb 85  06:46:27 PST

It just means that it will be the language that DoD uses for government
programs that incorporate Lisp.  We can also set up validation procedures.

Ron

--
From:      Rick Hudson <hudson%umass-cs.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Subject:   Minimalist model.
To:        cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Date:      Fri, 22 Feb 85 17:43 EST
Received:  from umass-cs by csnet-relay.csnet id al02005; 23 Feb 85 2:42 EST

Scott,
I like the idea of a DOD sponsored language better than a seperate
organization. It seems to get the most done for the least
work and would be palatable to most corporations.
Rick

--
From:  fateman%ucbdali@Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  DOD sponsored language
To:  cl-charter@su-ai
Message-Id:  <8502231739.AA11012@ucbdali.ARPA>
Date:  Sat, 23 Feb 85 09:39:29 pst
Received:  by ucbdali.ARPA (4.24/4.40)

DOD rather than Digital Press
should probably own the definitive document on Common Lisp 84.

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
In-reply-to:  Msg of 23 Feb 1985  12:39-EST from fateman%ucbdali at Berkeley (Richard Fateman)
Subject:  DOD sponsored language
Cc:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:    fateman%ucbdali@位Berkeley (Richard Fateman)位
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12090051001.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Sat, 23 Feb 1985  16:13 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Sat 23 Feb 85 16:13:44-EST


    DOD rather than Digital Press
    should probably own the definitive document on Common Lisp 84.

Yeah, whoever onws the trademark should also own the document, so that
these thing stay in sync.  I suppose it wold be possible to say "Common
Lisp 84 is defined as everything in the Digital Press manual, modulo the
following changes...", but that would be awkward at best.

- -- Scott

--
From:  Martin <GRISS%hplabs.csnet@csnet-relay.arpa>
Source-Info:   From (or Sender) name not authenticated.
Cc:  GRISS@hplabs.CSNET
To:  cl-charter@su-ai.ARPA
Subject:  HP response to charter discussion
Date:  Thu 28 Mar 85 06:27:00-PST
Message-Id:  <8503281424.AA24405@HP-VENUS>
Received:  by HP-VENUS id AA24405; Thu, 28 Mar 85 06:24:33 pst

Sorry for the delay in sending this, though I havent seen much action
on the list lately (barring the usual mail lossages that strike us all
at the most annoying times...)

I have been asked to respond to the Common LISP charter proposal as
Hewlett-Packard's representative. Since Hewlett-Packard is strongly
supportive of industry standards, our position is as follows:

We are in favor of a formal Common LISP Association (independent or
preferably related to some international society) to act as a visible
entity responsible for the current Common LISP definition (CL-84,
CL-85, etc.), the evolution of a precise standard and compatible
validation suite, and the resolution of issues related to change in
the definition.

We will contribute an appropriate corporate membership fee (around
$10,000/year) to be able to participate in the organization, and
obtain the benefits of representation, validation and free access to
distributed materials.

The model of an elected technical committee (of no more than 7),
responsible to the appropriate majority corporate veto, is acceptable.

Given our committment to a range of machines and applications for
which we expect (production quality) LISP and AI based systems to be
important components, we are concerned that the Common LISP charter
might include a definition of Common LISP that excludes potentially
interesting subsets. We do not believe enough experience with
practical applications of mature Common LISP implementations has yet
accumulated to permit the inclusion of a "strict" definition of Common
LISP in the charter; rather, the issue of levels of validation, and
compatible subsets, is a technical matter to be raised before the
Technical sub-committee.


Martin L. Griss

Manager
Programming Technology Department
Application Technology Center
Hewlett-Packard Laboratories
1501 Page Mill Road
Palo Alto, CA 94304
- -------

--
From:  Guy Steele <gls%AQUINAS@Think>
In-Reply-To:  The message of 8 Apr 85 11:46-EST from Mail Delivery Subsystem <MAILER-DAEMON at GODOT>
Cc:  gls%AQUINAS@Think
To:  cl-charter%sail@Think
Subject:  Returned mail: User unknown
Date:  Tuesday, 9 April 1985, 09:55-EST
Received:  by Think.ARPA with CHAOS id AA22179; Tue, 9 Apr 85 09:51:52 est


Last week Digital Press and I signed an agreement about licensing of
the Common Lisp manual to manufacturers.  The burden of it is that I
give Digital Press the necessary permission to set aside money for the
Common Lisp Committee.  Specifically, for every licensing agreement of
this type (the one with Data General being the first), where a
manufacturer republishes the manual itself, possibly with annotations,
$5000 is taken off the top and set aside for the use of the Common
Lisp Committee for such purposes as subsidizing travel, distributing
copies of 400-page drafts for the next revision cycle, and so on.

For now, this money is being placed in a special escrow account.  The
agreement states that if by December 30, 1986, no Common Lisp
Committee has been formed as a legal entity to which the money may be
transferred, then the escrow account will be closed, and Digital Press
gets half and sends the other half to me.

Very soon that account will have $5000 in it, with more to come.  It
behooves us, therefore, to get cracking so that this money may be put
to good use.  I think we should put out a revised edition of the
manual in 1986, which means that starting this summer I would like to
begin systematic resolution of the issues that have arisen, and be
able to distribute draft revisions this fall.  This will be a lot
easier if we have a charter.

- --Guy

--
From:  "Scott E. Fahlman" <Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Subject:  Status
To:    cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
Sender:  FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Message-ID:  <FAHLMAN.12101864378.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Date:  Tue, 9 Apr 1985  17:46 EST
Received:  ID <FAHLMAN@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>; Tue 9 Apr 85 17:46:34-EST


Just to update people on where things stand at my end:

The DARPA folks indicated to me that they would probably be giving ISI a
contract to perform some of the support activities that are needed by
the Common Lisp community.  This would allow us to proceed with either a
small, low-cost organiztion devoted entirely to standardization stuff,
or perhaps to get by with no formal organization.  A lot depends on just
when the ISI effort will start (assuming that DARPA does indeed go that
way) and what the scope of the support services might be under this
contract.  I have attempted to contact the relevant people at ISI to
discuss these issues, but have had no luck so far.  So until I
understand what's happening there, it's hard to know how to proceed.

The Digital Press fund seems like a reasonable way to fund a low-cost
standards organization, and $5K per year or so might be sufficient to
cover the miscellaneous costs of such a group without getting into the
heavy corporate dues that I suggested earlier.  There remains the issue
of who has control over such a group.  That's a tough one.

- -- Scott

--
From:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
In-Reply-To:  <FAHLMAN.12101864378.BABYL@CMU-CS-C.ARPA>
Message-ID:  <[USC-ISI.ARPA]10-Apr-85 08:41:04.OHLANDER>
Cc:  cl-charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  Fahlman@CMU-CS-C.ARPA
Subject:  Re: Status
Sender:  OHLANDER@USC-ISI.ARPA
Date:  10 Apr 1985 08:41-EST
Received:  from USC-ISI.ARPA by SU-AI.ARPA with TCP; 10 Apr 85  05:42:09 PST

As of now, Steve Squires does intend to get some support from ISI in keeping
the practical end of things going.  However, ISI will not take the place of 
intellectual leadership provided by a Common Lisp Users group.  The intent,
rather, is to use ISI to alleviate some of the burden from that group to
allow them to focus on issues that are more central to the continued
viability of the language.  The core problem still remains one of getting
a charter and instantiating a representative body.

Ron Ohlander

--
From: unknown
Subject: (no subject)

CL-Charter/su
Summary of Issues about the Charter

In this message I will try to summarize what seem be to the
issues discussed so far on this mailing list. I do this to
remind people of what has gone before in the hope that our December
meeting will go well.

1. On January 21, 1985, Scott Fahlman proposed a charter for Common Lisp.
It's main features were that it had corporate and individual memberships,
a 7 member technical committee, and control of validation and the CL-86,
CL-87, etc. trademarks. It proposed a legal, separate entity. The technical
committee made technical decisions regarding the language and validation
suite. The corporate and individuals members could override these decisions
with a 2/3 majority. 

There was considerable discussion of this proposal. The 2/3 majority
was an outcome of these discussions, a simple majority being originally
proposed. I can re-mail this proposal if people wish.

2. An earlier proposal was to make the Common Lisp organization part of AAAI,
because the cost of starting an new organization is high.

3. Should the names CL-86 etc. be trademarked and grante to validated Common
Lisps.

4. There is some evidence that there is an ISO Lisp proposal on the
horizon, or at least a proposal to propose such a Lisp. Should the
Common Lisp Group respond? It seems to matter who runs the ISO committee
as to whether the committee is effective.

5. Should the Common Lisp Group do validation, or should some other
mechanism, like a contract house, do the actual work?  How shall this
validation suite be gathered?

6. Should the Common Lisp manual copyright be wrested or bought from
Digital Press?

7. Should there be a statement of Common Lisp principles that the CLG
(Common Lisp Group) cannot easily change?

8. Many of the discussions mix up the original goal of defining a Common Lisp
specification that various Lisps could satisfy with the current situation
of Lisps being written to specifically be a Common Lisp (and perhaps more).
That is, the state of affairs seems to have shifted from existing Lisps
trying to become Common Lisps to implementation groups setting out to
create a Common Lisp. Does this situation imply that the Common Lisp
specification should become more of a language definition rather than
a minimal specification? A language definition would remove many
of the famous Common Lisp Ambiguities.

9. Should Fahlman's proposal be amended so that there is a larger
corporate/individual technical body with the 7-member technical
committee being a court of appeals and advice? That is, should the
body that proposes technical changes and clarifications be larger
than 7?

10. How should electronic mail be distributed to the various members?
Will a caste system arise because CSNET is slower than the ARPANET?

11. On February 18, 1985, Scott Fahlman proposed a minimalist charter
as competition to the longer January 21 document. I can re-mail
this if people wish.

			-rpg-

--
From: RPG  
To:    CL-Charter@SU-AI.ARPA 
Subject: Summary of Issues about the Charter
Date: 23 Nov 1985 13:52 EST

In this message I will try to summarize what seem be to the
issues discussed so far on this mailing list. I do this to
remind people of what has gone before in the hope that our December
meeting will go well.

1. On January 21, 1985, Scott Fahlman proposed a charter for Common Lisp.
It's main features were that it had corporate and individual memberships,
a 7 member technical committee, and control of validation and the CL-86,
CL-87, etc. trademarks. It proposed a legal, separate entity. The technical
committee made technical decisions regarding the language and validation
suite. The corporate and individuals members could override these decisions
with a 2/3 majority. 

There was considerable discussion of this proposal. The 2/3 majority
was an outcome of these discussions, a simple majority being originally
proposed. I can re-mail this proposal if people wish.

2. An earlier proposal was to make the Common Lisp organization part of AAAI,
because the cost of starting an new organization is high.

3. Should the names CL-86 etc. be trademarked and grante to validated Common
Lisps.

4. There is some evidence that there is an ISO Lisp proposal on the
horizon, or at least a proposal to propose such a Lisp. Should the
Common Lisp Group respond? It seems to matter who runs the ISO committee
as to whether the committee is effective.

5. Should the Common Lisp Group do validation, or should some other
mechanism, like a contract house, do the actual work?  How shall this
validation suite be gathered?

6. Should the Common Lisp manual copyright be wrested or bought from
Digital Press?

7. Should there be a statement of Common Lisp principles that the CLG
(Common Lisp Group) cannot easily change?

8. Many of the discussions mix up the original goal of defining a Common Lisp
specification that various Lisps could satisfy with the current situation
of Lisps being written to specifically be a Common Lisp (and perhaps more).
That is, the state of affairs seems to have shifted from existing Lisps
trying to become Common Lisps to implementation groups setting out to
create a Common Lisp. Does this situation imply that the Common Lisp
specification should become more of a language definition rather than
a minimal specification? A language definition would remove many
of the famous Common Lisp Ambiguities.

9. Should Fahlman's proposal be amended so that there is a larger
corporate/individual technical body with the 7-member technical
committee being a court of appeals and advice? That is, should the
body that proposes technical changes and clarifications be larger
than 7?

10. How should electronic mail be distributed to the various members?
Will a caste system arise because CSNET is slower than the ARPANET?

11. On February 18, 1985, Scott Fahlman proposed a minimalist charter
as competition to the longer January 21 document. I can re-mail
this if people wish.

			-rpg-

--
From:  Hewitt@MIT-MC.ARPA
Message-ID:  <851123180556.7.HEWITT@DUE-PROCESS.AI.MIT.EDU>
In-Reply-To:  The message of 23 Nov 85 16:52-EST from Dick Gabriel <RPG@SU-AI.ARPA>
cc:  CL-Charter@SU-AI.ARPA, Hewitt@MIT-MC.ARPA
To:  Dick Gabriel <RPG@SU-AI.ARPA>
Subject:  Summary of Issues about the Charter    
Date:  Sat, 23 Nov 85 18:05 EST
Received:  from MIT-DUE-PROCESS by MIT-OZ via Chaosnet; 23 Nov 85 18:05-EST

Dick,

I am rather dubious about this matter of a 7 member technical committee.
Could you please forward the minimalist charter that Scott sent out on
February 18?  I don't seem to have a copy.

Thanks,

Carl

--
From:  Kahn.pa@Xerox.ARPA
Message-ID:  <851125-115037-2739@Xerox>
cc:  CL-Charter@SU-AI.ARPA
To:  RPG@SU-AI.ARPA
In-reply-to:  Dick Gabriel <RPG@SU-AI.ARPA>'s message of 23 Nov 85 13:52
Subject:  Re: Summary of Issues about the Charter    
Date:  25 Nov 85 11:41 PST
Received:  from Salvador.ms by ArpaGateway.ms ; 25 NOV 85 11:50:37 PST

I'd like copies of those proposal you mentioned.

Thanks
 -ken kahn

--
